S.  294,  THE  PASSENGER  RAIL  INVESTMENT 

AND  IMPROVEMENT  ACT  OF  2007 

S.  HRG.  110–1064 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION 

AND MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, 

SAFETY, AND SECURITY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

FEBRUARY  27,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

36–075 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

MARGARET SPRING,  Democratic  General  Counsel 
LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION  AND  MERCHANT 

MARINE  INFRASTRUCTURE,  SAFETY,  AND  SECURITY 

FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on February 27, 2007  .......................................................................
Statement of Senator Carper  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Statement of Senator Stevens 

WITNESSES 

Boardman, Hon. Joseph H., Administrator, Federal Railroad Administration  ..
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Busalacchi,  Hon.  Frank  J.,  Secretary,  Wisconsin  Department  of  Transpor-
tation; Chair, States for Passenger Rail Coalition  ............................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Casey, Jr., Hon. Robert P., U.S. Senator from Pennsylvania  ..............................
Kummant, Alex, President/Chief Executive Officer, Amtrak  ...............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
..............
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Taylor, Kelly, Administrator, Oregon Department of Transportation Rail Divi-
sion  ........................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Rendell, Hon. Edward G., Governor, Commonwealth of Pennsylvania 

APPENDIX 

Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg  to: 
Hon. Joseph H. Boardman  ...............................................................................
Hon. Frank J. Busalacchi 
................................................................................
Alex Kummant  ..................................................................................................

Page 
1 
5 
11 
1 
9 
3 
2 
3 

12 
14 

26 
28 
4 
22 
24 
5 
7 

18 
19 

41 
42 
43 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

S.  294,  THE  PASSENGER  RAIL  INVESTMENT 

AND  IMPROVEMENT  ACT  OF  2007 

TUESDAY,  FEBRUARY  27,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION AND 

MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, SAFETY, AND SECURITY,
COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The Subcommittee met, pursuant to notice, at 10:05 a.m. in room 
SR–253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Welcome,  please  take  your  seats.  I  would 

like to make a brief statement. 

First,  I’m  pleased  that  the  long-time  Chairman  of  this  Com-
mittee,  and  many  others,  are  with  us,  Senator  Stevens.  Senator 
Lott,  unfortunately,  was  unable  to  break  an  appointment  that  he 
had in Mississippi, but he fully supports our request for urgent at-
tention to this critical situation. 

Governor  Rendell  is  here,  and  he’s  part  of  the  National  Gov-
ernors Conference that’s taking place. I will make my remarks and 
then,  Senator  Stevens,  yours,  and  then  if  we  can  hear  Governor 
Rendell  and  see  if  we  have  a  question  or  two,  and  I  ask  the  pa-
tience of the others of you who are at the witness table. 

I  want  to  welcome  everyone  to  today’s  hearing  as  we  begin  to 
fundamentally  change  the  way  that  America  travels.  I  want  to 
thank  all  of  our  witnesses,  some  of  whom  come  from  States  that 
are already embracing this change. And we welcome the input and 
the ideas that each one of you brings. 

Today’s hearing is about Senator Lott’s and my vision for our Na-
tion’s  transportation  system,  a  system  with  more  options  and  con-
venience  for  travelers,  and  less  damage  to  our  environment,  less 
dependence  on  foreign  oil.  Along  with  air  and  vehicle  travel,  pas-
senger  rail  should  be  one  of  the  three  legs  on  which  our  transpor-
tation  network  rests,  and  Amtrak  should  be  among  the  greatest 
passenger  rail  systems  in  the  world.  The  Passenger  Rail  Invest-
ment  and  Improvement  Act  of  2007  can  help  turn  that  vision  into 
a reality. 

And, as any traveler will tell you, we need to implement that vi-
sion, because strengthening this intercity travel option is way over-
due. Our highways are jammed, the average New Jerseyan spends 
300  hours  commuting  by  car  every  year,  and  15  percent  of  that 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

time is wasted sitting in traffic. We know that our skies are becom-
ing  more  crowded  as  more  planes  take  to  the  air.  Last  year  was 
the  worst  year  for  flight  delays  since  2000.  One  in  four  airplanes 
was  late,  and  we  expect  nearly  5,000  new  very  light  jets  to  add  to 
this  traffic  over  the  next  10  years.  We’ve  come  to  the  realization 
that  the  skies  are  not  infinite  in  their  capacity  to  take  more  air-
planes.  Between  lines  of  cars  and  the  maddening,  indeterminate 
lines  at  airports,  time  is  wasted,  American  travelers  need  and  de-
serve  another  choice,  and  a  reliable  first-class  passenger  rail  sys-
tem is it. 

Disasters  like  September  11th,  Hurricanes  Katrina  or  Rita,  also 
showed  that  America  needs  passenger  rail.  When  air  travel  was 
canceled on 9/11, people rode the rails. And when the roads became 
lakes during Katrina, and Rita—people could have turned to trains 
to  evacuate  some  of  our  most  vulnerable  people,  and  to  move  sup-
plies,  but  it  didn’t  take  place.  The  recognition  that  those  facilities 
were available did not strike those in charge. 

Amtrak’s  record  ridership,  nearly  25  million  passengers  last 
year, proved that Americans want rail. Our bill will lay the tracks 
for  a  strong  passenger  rail  network,  one  that  will  bring  more  bal-
ance and efficiency to our national transportation system. 

Our bill will invest $19 billion in America’s passenger rail system 
over  the  next  6  years.  That’s  combined  with  a  bond  proposal  that 
Senator  Lott  and  I  hope  the  Finance  Committee  will  act  upon  as 
quickly  as  they  can.  It  will  fully  fund  Amtrak,  allow  it  to  upgrade 
its  equipment,  improve  its  security,  and  return  the  Northeast  Cor-
ridor  to  a  state  of  good  repair.  And  it  will  create  a  new  intercity 
rail  grant  program  to  build  passenger  lines  between  more  of  our 
country’s towns and cities. 

Just  this  year,  the  government  will  spend  more  than  $39  billion 
on  roads,  more  than  $15  billion  on  airports,  and  yet,  slightly  over 
$1 billion on rail. And it’s time for America to get onboard with the 
passenger rail system. 

And the timing, unfortunately, couldn’t be better, nor more obvi-
ous,  than  these  last  few  days  of  travel  in  our  country.  Throughout 
the  country,  the  weather  just  took  care  of  opportunities  to  get 
places  and  to  carry  on  needed  functions  for  people.  And  I  person-
ally  took  the  train  down  from  New  Jersey  yesterday,  and,  I’ll  tell 
you,  after  checking  with  the  airports  and  finding  out  there  were 
delays all over, canceled flights, et cetera, I don’t know how we can 
continue  to  ignore  this  crucial  need.  So,  we’re  going  to  work  hard 
to make it happen. 

And, Senator Stevens, if you have any comments, please. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. Well, Mr. Chairman, I commend you and Sen-
ator  Lott  for  putting  the  time  and  effort  into  this  bill.  It’s  quite 
similar  to  the  bill  that  was  reported  out  of  the  Senate  last  year. 
It  has  some  improvements.  And  I  do  think  it’s  a  bill  that  should 
become  law.  I  hope  that  we  can  listen  to  these  witnesses.  I  expect 
some of my colleagues to join us soon. 

And  I  ask  that  Senator  Smith’s  statement  appear  in  the  record 

before mine. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

Senator LAUTENBERG. So ordered. 
[The prepared statements of Senators Smith and Stevens follow:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 
Thank you Mr. Chairman. I want to thank our witnesses for being here. I antici-
pate that this hearing will be informative, and I appreciate the participation of the 
panel. 

In  particular,  I  would  like  to  welcome  Kelly  Taylor  who  is  the  Administrator  of 
the Oregon Department of Transportation’s Rail Division. Ms. Taylor has worked for 
ODOT  since  1978,  serving  Oregon  in  many  capacities.  I  appreciate  her  making  the 
trek to be here with us today. 

Amtrak has long been a source of debate as policymakers have struggled between 
the  need  for  intercity  passenger  rail  service  and  the  financial  viability  of  operating 
and maintaining that service. 

In  recent  years,  Amtrak  has  experienced  record  ridership,  carrying  more  than  24 

million passengers each year. 

At  the  same  time,  the  financial  and  operational  state  of  Amtrak  continues  to  be 

abysmal, running deficits in the neighborhood of $1 billion per year. 

Mr. Chairman, I think we all agree that changes must be made. 
I  applaud  the  inclusion  of  a  number  of  reform  measures  in  the  reauthorization 

bill that will improve Amtrak’s efficiency and performance. 

I  have  long  advocated  for  the  establishment  of  an  equitable  system  for  states  to 
pay  their  fair  share  toward  the  operating  costs  related  to  Amtrak  corridor  routes. 
In  the  Northwest,  Amtrak  operates  one  such  route,  the  Amtrak  Cascades,  which 
provides  daily  service  between  Eugene,  Oregon  and  Vancouver,  British  Columbia. 
This service is supported through operating funds provided by the States of Oregon 
and Washington. 

With  more  than  600,000  riders  last  year,  the  Amtrak  Cascades  is  the  seventh 
most heavily traveled corridor in the country and represents a model for partnership 
among states, Amtrak, freight railroads and local communities. 

Currently, Oregon is one of 14 states that provide operating funds to support and 
maintain  Amtrak’s  service.  I  am  pleased  to  see  that  this  bill  moves  in  a  direction 
that  will  ensure  a  more  equitable  allocation  of  costs  among  states,  with  each  state 
chipping in its fair share. 

I believe that the state-Amtrak partnerships outlined in this bill—with respect to 
both  the  cost  allocation  and  capital  match—will  be  key  to  ensuring  the  long-term 
viability and growth in ridership of intercity passenger rail. 

The  bill  that  Senators  Lautenberg  and  Lott  have  put  forth  is  a  step  in  the  right 

direction, and I am proud to cosponsor this reform legislation. 

Thank you Mr. Chairman. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

I commend Senators Lautenberg and Lott for all of the time and effort they have 
put  into  crafting  S.  294,  the  Passenger  Rail  Investment  and  Improvement  Act  of 
2007. This bill provides true, substantive reform of our national passenger rail sys-
tem. 

Last  Congress,  the  Senate  included  an  amendment  in  the  budget  bill  that  con-

tained language similar to S. 294. However, it failed to survive in conference. 

I  am  hopeful  that  this  bill  will  be  signed  into  law  this  year.  And,  I  look  forward 

to hearing from our witnesses their thoughts on the bill. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Governor Rendell, we welcome you—— 
Senator STEVENS. Turn on your light for your thing. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Light’s  on.  As  a  matter  of  fact,  a  quick 
aside, last night there were no lights on in my—the building I live, 
nor for blocks around, and I had to stay at a hotel near the Capitol 
here. It was hard finding my socks in the dark. 

So, Governor Rendell, the Governor of the State of Pennsylvania, 
and where we share lots of problems in common, be they rail prob-
lems,  transportation  problems  generally,  including  highways,  in-
cluding  commuters,  and  you  name  it.  And  so—and  we’re  pleased 
also to have a colleague of Governor Rendell’s here, a new member 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

of  the  Senate,  a  very  welcome  member  of  the  Senate,  someone  we 
look  to  for  help  and  guidance  in  the  projects  that  we  take  on  that 
affect the country and, of course, our neighboring States. 

So, Senator Casey, if you would say—like to make a few remarks 

about Governor Rendell. 

STATEMENT OF HON. ROBERT P. CASEY, JR., 

U.S. SENATOR FROM PENNSYLVANIA 

Senator  CASEY.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  want  to  thank  you  for  this  op-

portunity—and Senator Stevens. 

I  have  a  great  honor  today  to  introduce  a  friend  of  mine  and  a 
great  leader  for  our  State,  known  across  the  country  as  the  great 
leader of the city of Philadelphia; before that, as the district attor-
ney of Philadelphia; and now, for almost 5 years, as Governor. 

And I have the honor to introduce Governor Rendell. And I won’t 
make a long introduction, but I do want to thank him for the work 
that he’s done as the Governor of the State and in his work as the 
mayor of Philadelphia to support not just transportation generally, 
but,  in  particular,  to  be  a  strong  advocate  for  rail,  transportation, 
and especially Amtrak. 

The Passenger Rail Investment and Improvement Act of 2007, as 
we all know, will authorize almost $20 billion in Federal funds for 
Amtrak  by  authorizing  3.2  billion  per  year  over  6  years.  And  I 
know you, Mr. Chairman, and so many others, are concerned about 
getting  this  legislation  passed.  I’m  a  cosponsor  of  this  legislation. 
Just to give you some sense of what Pennsylvania has as—in terms 
of  a  stake  in  this,  we  have  120  daily  trains—Amtrak  operates  120 
daily  trains  in  Pennsylvania.  Our  hub  of  Philadelphia  is  the  third 
busiest  Amtrak  station  in  the  Nation.  Pennsylvania  had  a  total  of 
4.9 million riders in Fiscal Year 1906. We have over—almost 3,000 
Pennsylvanians  employed  by  Amtrak.  For  so  many  reasons,  fund-
ing  for  Amtrak  is  central  to  economic  development  efforts,  central 
to  the  daily  life  of  so  many  Pennsylvanians.  And,  as  a  United 
States  Senator  from  Pennsylvania,  I’m  very  concerned  about  the 
funding  for  Amtrak.  That’s  why  I’m  a  cosponsor.  And  I  appreciate 
the work that this committee has done to highlight that. 

And  no  better  person  could  speak  for  Pennsylvania,  in  terms  of 
future,  in  terms  of  our  economic  development  potential,  and  in 
terms of the importance and the primacy of Amtrak to the develop-
ment  of  southeastern  Pennsylvania  and,  indeed,  our  whole  State, 
other than Governor Rendell. 

We’re  honored  to  be  here  with  him  today.  He  was  just  resound-
ingly  reelected  as  the  Governor  of  our  State,  and  it’s  my  honor  to 
introduce to you the Governor of Pennsylvania, Edward G. Rendell. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. If I may take a minute, we’ve had another 

person from the neighborhood come in. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  And  Senator  Carper,  if  you  would  like  to 

make a statement. 

Senator CARPER. Just a real quick—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

STATEMENT OF HON. THOMAS R. CARPER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM DELAWARE 

Senator  CARPER.  I  think  there’s  a  certain  irony  here.  Senator 

Casey, did you ever run for Governor? 

Senator CASEY. I don’t remember. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  CARPER.  It’s  interesting  how  things  work  out  in  politics, 
because 4 years or so ago, I think you both contended for the same 
spot.  I  think  we’re  just  very  lucky  that  you  both  ended  up  where 
you  are,  and  it’s  a  real  joy  to  serve  with  Senator  Casey.  He  sits 
right beside me on my right hand on the Senate floor. 

Governor  Rendell,  it’s  a  delight  to  have  you  here.  You’ve  been  a 
terrific  champion  of  passenger  rail  for  as  long  as  I  can  remember. 
And we appreciate that and are very much looking forward to what 
you have to say. 

To  our  other  witnesses  today,  including  the  new  president  for 
Amtrak, we’re delighted that you’re all here. Welcome. Thank you. 
This is an important hearing, and we’re excited to get started on 

this reauthorization once again. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks. 
Governor, if you could limit your testimony to 5 minutes. 
Senator  CARPER.  Mr.  Chairman,  could  I  just  say  one  more  quick 

thing, please? 

Judge  Rendell,  Midge  Rendell,  was  in  Wilmington,  Delaware, 
yesterday  for  the  swearing  in  of  a  new  judge  on  the  Third  Circuit 
Court  of  Appeals.  And  they  were  delighted  so  this  is  an  important 
and exciting week for your family, I suppose. 

Governor RENDELL. That’s right. 
Senator CARPER. It’s great to see you both. 
Governor RENDELL. Well—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Welcome, and—— 
Governor RENDELL.—good morning—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Please. 
STATEMENT OF HON. EDWARD G. RENDELL, GOVERNOR, 

COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA 

Governor RENDELL. Good morning, Mr. Chairman. 
And  I’d  like  to  thank  Senator  Casey  for  being  here,  and  for  his 
kind  introduction,  and,  most  of  all,  for  his  strong  support  of  this 
very important piece of legislation. 

And I’d like to thank Senator Lott, who I know couldn’t be here, 
with Senator Smith, Senator Stevens, Senator Carper, and our own 
Senator Specter, for your steadfast support of Amtrak. 

In  my  career  as  mayor  and  Governor,  this  is  the  fifth  time  I’ve 
testified  before  a  Senate  committee  on  behalf  of  Amtrak.  And  not 
much has changed, although Senate bill 294 will bring about defin-
itive improvements and significant change. 

I have just two points that I want to make. If we improve it, peo-
ple  will  come.  There  is  absolutely  no  doubt  in  my  mind.  If  there 
has  ever  been  a  context,  if  there  has  ever  been  a  time  to  invest  in 
mass transit—and understand that intercity passenger rail is mass 
transit—if  there  has  ever  been  a  time  to  invest  in  mass  transit, 
with  rising  gasoline  prices,  with  the  congestions  on  the  highways 
that  you  mentioned  in  your  opening  remarks,  Senator  Lautenberg, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

this is the time. It can work, and it does work. The states are will-
ing to be partners with the Federal Government and Amtrak. 

6 

And I want to draw the panel’s attention to something that hap-
pened,  actually,  before  I  became  Governor.  Governor  Tom  Ridge, 
my  predecessor,  a  leading  Republican,  lest  we  all  forget,  Governor 
Ridge  entered  into  an  agreement  with  Amtrak  about  something 
called  the  ‘‘Keystone  Corridor.’’  It’s  a  train  that  stops—makes  five 
stops  between  Philadelphia  and  Harrisburg,  our  capital  city.  Both 
Amtrak  and  the  State  of  Pennsylvania  agreed  to  put  $74  million 
each  into  capital  funds  to  improve  every  facet  of  the  line.  The  im-
provements  were  underway.  I  became  Governor  and  continued 
those improvements, even though our capital budget was stretched 
very thin. And the results were startling. In 2004, the ridership on 
the  Keystone  Corridor  was  898,000  people.  During  that  year,  the 
improvements  set  in—actually,  they  set  in  by  the  beginning  of 
2004—2005,  excuse  me—in  2005,  ridership  jumped  to  1,009,000 
riders,  a  121⁄2 percent  increase.  We  continued  to  put  additional 
money  in,  both  Amtrak  and  the  State  of  Pennsylvania,  and  we 
managed to take the Keystone Corridor trip from 2 hours, 120 min-
utes, to 90 minutes. That has only been in operation, the 90-minute 
time  span,  for  about  41⁄2 months.  During  those  41⁄2 months,  rider-
ship  has  increased  another  12  percent.  Another  12  percent.  And, 
best of all, we’re all paying for it. The state’s paying for it, Amtrak, 
and, thereby, the Federal Government, is paying for it, and the rid-
ers  are  paying  for  it,  because,  with  the  improvements,  we  raised 
the  prices.  And  notwithstanding  an  increase  in  price,  we  had  a 
121⁄2 percent  jump  in  ridership,  over  100,000  new  riders  in  one 
year,  and,  in  less  than  6  months,  we’ve  had  another  121⁄2 percent 
increase.  I  ride—when  I  was  Mayor,  and  now  as  Governor—I  ride 
the Northeast Corridor a lot. 

Think,  for  a  minute—and  I’m  told  that  this  is  eminently  pos-
sible—think,  for  a  minute,  if  you  could  get  from  Washington  to 
New York in an hour and 40 minutes, or an hour and 30 minutes, 
and  New  York  to  Boston  in  an  hour  and  30  minutes,  do  you  know 
what  would  happen?  We  would  end  shuttle  plane  service.  There 
would  be  no  need.  If  you  could  get  to  Boston  to  Washington  in  3 
hours  without  going  through  airport  security  lines,  without  the 
travel time out to airports, you would end that shuttle. Ending that 
shuttle  would  improve  airport  congestion  in  Boston,  in  LaGuardia, 
in  BWI,  in  Newark,  and  in  Philadelphia  Airport.  It  would  have  a 
significant  impact  in  ending  congestion.  The  way  to  end  airport 
congestion is, 500 miles and under, to have a first-class high-speed 
passenger rail system. 

The only other point I want to make is that this bill is approach-
ing  it  correctly.  You  are  making  these  improvements  through  cap-
ital fundings and through bonding. Look, would any of us here buy 
a  house,  paying  cash?  Of  course  not.  And  yet,  the  Federal  Govern-
ment,  dealing  with  the  Nation’s  infrastructure  problems,  has  been 
trying to deal with those problems out of the operating budget. No 
business  does  that.  No  governmental  subdivision  in  the  United 
States  of  America  does  that.  It  doesn’t  work.  You  can’t  pay  for 
major capital infrastructure repairs out of the operating budget. No 
one does it. It doesn’t work. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

The  other  six  G–7  nations  have  all,  in  the  last  5  years,  either 
gone  through  or  started  major  trillion-dollar  infrastructure  repair 
programs.  We  are  never  going  to  eat  into  the  backlog  on  our  high-
ways,  bridges,  and  roads,  on  our  rail  systems  or  airports  or  our 
ports,  on  infrastructure,  water  and  sewer—combined  sewer  over-
flows, clean water systems—we are never going to do that until the 
Federal  Government  follows  the  lead  here,  in  Senate  bill  294,  and 
adopts  a  Federal  capital  budget.  Until  that  day  happens,  we  will 
never,  ever  have  a  first-class  infrastructure  again,  whether  that’s 
Amtrak, our roads, our water, and sewer. 

I testified—President Clinton convened a commission on the cap-
ital  budget.  It  was  chaired  by,  then—Goldman  Sachs  CEO  John 
Corzine,  and  Kathleen  Brown,  who  was  then  the  treasurer  of  the 
State  of  California.  I  testified  strongly  in  favor  of  it.  There  were 
some  OMB  types  who  were  against  it.  They  would  not  have  fi-
nanced Columbus’s boats over to America. We’d all be on the other 
side of the ocean. And the commission actually issued a report that 
said  nothing.  They  didn’t  endorse  anything.  They  just  handed  on 
to the President the different—the varying opinions. 

But  this  bill  will  work,  because  you  are  not  doing  it  alone,  from 
operating, you are doing bonds, you are doing a semi-capital budget 
here.  It’s  never  going  to  change—Amtrak  or  anything  else—until 
we  have  a  legitimate  Federal  capital  budget  to  fix  the  infrastruc-
ture  of  this  country.  How  can  the  greatest,  richest,  most  powerful 
country  in  the  world  have  a  crumbling  infrastructure,  have  an  in-
frastructure  that  doesn’t  support  air  travel,  that  doesn’t  cruise 
first-class ports, that has no passenger rail system, that has a chal-
lenged  freight  rail  system—in  Pennsylvania,  despite  the  fact  that 
I  have  spent  over  a  billion  dollars  more  on  roads  and  bridges,  we 
still  have  one-third—over  one-third  of  our  budget—of  our  bridges 
structurally obsolete or deficient—structurally deficient. No matter 
how  much  we  spend,  we  cannot  catch  up.  I  know  it’s  the  same  in 
Delaware,  in  Oregon,  in  Alaska.  There  are  capital  needs—of  all 
sorts,  not  just  transportation—facing  this  country,  and  they  won’t 
be changed until we have a Federal capital budget. 

But,  with  that,  let  me  strongly  endorse  Senate  bill  294.  It  is  the 
best piece of legislation for Amtrak that I have seen in my 30-year 
public career. 

[The prepared statement of Governor Rendell follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. EDWARD G. RENDELL, GOVERNOR, 

COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA 

Good morning. First I would like to thank you Senator Lautenberg for your long-
standing commitment to transportation policy and transportation funding. We need 
more  voices  like  yours  in  Washington.  And  I  applaud  the  leadership  provided  by 
many  others  on  this  issue  as  well;  in  particular  the  dedication  Senator  Lott  has 
shown  to  Amtrak  over  the  years.  And  many  others  have  contributed  as  well—Sen-
ator  Smith,  Senator  Carper,  of  course  my  friend  Senator  Specter.  And  we  will  all 
get a lot of help from Pennsylvania’s newest Senator, Bob Casey. All of your dedica-
tion  to  supporting  Amtrak  across  party  lines  has  helped  this  issue  remain  bipar-
tisan and the country is the better for it. 

Our  particular  focus  today  of  course  is  Amtrak.  The  Northeast  Corridor  (NEC)  is 
a  vital  link  for  the  economy  of  Philadelphia  and  all  of  southeastern  Pennsylvania, 
and  it  is  crucial  that  Federal  support  for  this  service  and  the  people  who  provide 
it  continues.  I  am  not  telling  you  anything  you  don’t  already  know  but  I  will  say 
it nonetheless: it is vital that Amtrak funding be reauthorized without any interrup-
tion. Too many people’s lives and livelihoods depend on it. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

One illustration of the importance of the Northeast Corridor to our regional econ-
omy comes from the our own local CEO Council, which is made up of over 60 CEOs 
of major corporations in the Philadelphia region. These CEOs have made preserving 
and improving intercity and commuter service on the NEC one of their top priorities 
and  they  hope  to  work  with  business  groups  throughout  the  Northeast  to  ensure 
that  Congress  takes  action  to  address  the  infrastructure  needs  on  the  NEC.  I  hope 
that they can help educate critics within the Bush Administration about the impor-
tance business leaders place in fast and reliable rail service. 

While  bringing  the  NEC  back  to  a  state  of  good  repair  is  critical,  I  hope  that  we 
can  also  seek  to  move  to  the  next  level  and  address  trip  time  and  capacity  issues 
as well. 

The  NEC  is  the  most  advanced  corridor  in  the  Nation,  but  there  are  many  other 
corridors that hold great potential to be a relevant transportation alternative if only 
Congress  would  provide  the  same  Federal  capital  matching  funds  for  intercity  pas-
senger rail that it does for other modes of transportation. 

The  Keystone  Corridor  between  Philadelphia  and  Harrisburg  is  a  great  example 
of what a Federal-state partnership can accomplish. Under the administration of my 
predecessor Governor Ridge—a Republican, I might add, in case anyone has forgot-
ten—the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and Amtrak entered into a partnership to 
invest in a major upgrade to this line to make it more reliable, faster and more at-
tractive. During my administration there was some question as to whether Amtrak 
would keep its end of the bargain due to its dire financial condition, but we worked 
with David Gunn to renew the partnership and finish the job. 

Altogether  we  each  put  in  $74  million.  The  result  is  substantially  quicker  trip 
times  and  big  increases  in  ridership;  the  new  service  has  been  fully  implemented 
in just the last few months and already we have seen a jump in ridership of 12 per-
cent.  And  I  might  add  that  the  users  of  the  service  are  paying  a  share  as  well— 
fares  went  up  as  the  new  service  was  implemented  but  this  has  had  no  effect  that 
we can see on usage. 

The moral of the story here is simple—people want better servive and within rea-
son they’re willing to pay for it. This is true for state government and it is true for 
riders. But by themselves neither of these groups can bring about the improvements 
in  service  they  so  badly  want.  Amtrak  and  the  Federal  Government  have  to  take 
the lead or it will not happen. 

There are other similar corridors with great potential in many other states: Cali-
fornia,  Washington,  Oregon,  Illinois,  Wisconsin,  Virginia  and  Maine  and  many 
more.  Many  of  these  states  have  been  putting  money  into  these  corridors  on  their 
own,  but  the  progress  they  can  make  is  limited  without  a  reliable  Federal  partner. 
Unfortunately,  Amtrak’s  current  policy  threatens  to  take  corridors  in  exactly  the 
wrong direction. Rather than promote and encourage these corridors, Amtrak is ask-
ing  states  to  pay  a  higher  share  of  current  operating  expenses.  I  and  many  of  my 
fellow Governors are willing to have a conversation about paying more to get better 
service, but asking the states to pay more just so the Federal Government can avoid 
its responsibility to support a first-class transportation system is just wrong. 

This  is  what  our  former  Secretary  of  Transportation  Norm  Mineta  famously  la-
beled  ‘‘the  shift  and  the  shaft.’’  Originally  the  states  were  told  that  we  would  be 
asked  to  pay  higher  operating  expenses  only  in  conjunction  with  a  Federal  capital 
matching program, and in Pennsylvania we agreed to do so. Investments were made 
in  some  corridors,  but  overall  the  much  anticipated  Federal  capital  matching  pro-
gram was never created. And yet Amtrak has continued to ask states with emerging 
corridors to increase their share of the costs. 

For  my  part,  I  see  this  debate  over  Amtrak  as  just  one  piece  of  the  larger  chal-
lenge  that  faces  us  on  transportation  and  infrastructure  overall.  In  all  of  the  areas 
that matter so much to our future—intercity rail, public transit, roads and bridges, 
clean water, aviation, you name it—the Federal Government pays for long term cap-
ital  investments  in  infrastructure  out  of  annual  operating  funds.  In  some  cases— 
for  example,  the  Highway  Trust  Fund—we  have  managed  to  create  a  dedicated 
fund,  but  even  here  our  level  of  spending  in  any  given  year  is  dependent  on  how 
much comes in. For Amtrak and other areas needing investment we don’t even have 
that,  and  investment  levels  are  completely  unpredictable  from  1  year  to  the  next. 
This is no way to run a railroad. 

More  to  the  point,  it’s  not  how  the  private  sector  actually  runs  railroads,  and  for 
good reason. Outside the Federal Government, most big companies and governments 
that  have  large  capital  investment  programs  finance  capital  and  operations  dif-
ferently. Operating costs are paid from operating revenues as they come in, and cap-
ital  costs  are  paid  for  through  borrowing,  with  the  term  of  the  borrowing  matched 
to  the  likely  useful  life  of  the  asset  being  built  or  purchased.  You  wouldn’t  buy  a 
house  with  cash  and  we  shouldn’t  buy  our  bridges  that  way  either.  This  is  a  basic 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

principle of finance called capital budgeting that everyone seems to have figured out 
but us. 

9 

Adoption  of  a  capital  budget  allows  those  who  manage  the  system  to  make  long- 
term  capital  plans  and  invest  in  their  facilities  at  the  time  when  the  investment 
makes  the  most  sense.  In  practical  terms  this  means  we  repair  or  replace  an  asset 
when it makes sense to do so from a life-cycle cost point of view, rather than when 
the cash-flow looks good. This is exactly how we financed our share of the Philadel-
phia-to-Harrisburg  improvements  I  mentioned  a  moment  ago,  and  as  a  result  the 
investment  happened  on  the  front  end  even  though  the  easiest  way  for  us  to  pay 
for it is a little bit every year over time. Which is just how we are experiencing the 
benefits  of  the  project.  At  its  core,  capital  budgeting  aligns  costs  with  benefits  over 
time, and it is a basic practice of good business. 

I believe it will be very hard for us to really fix Amtrak’s financial mess or make 
the investments we need to into roads and bridges, wastewater and other infrastruc-
ture systems until the Federal Government adopts a capital budget. 

Getting  back  to  our  rail  system,  we  have  been  at  this  for  too  long  with  too  little 
progress. Intercity rail corridors hold so much potential to improve mobility and get 
people  off  the  roads  into  more  energy  efficient  and  environment-friendly  trains. 
With your leadership, I have renewed hope that we can end the tiresome yearly de-
bates about whether Amtrak should exist and actually make progress on the North-
east Corridor, on the Cascades Corridor, on the Hiawatha Line, on the Capital Cor-
ridor,  and  elsewhere.  I  urge  you  to  pass  S.  294  and  give  this  Nation  a  rail  policy 
that  moves  beyond  ideological  debates  and  gives  us  a  new  transportation  alter-
native.  Thank  you  for  your  leadership  and  I  stand  ready  to  assist  you  in  any  way 
possible. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Governor, thanks very much. 
The  story  about  the  Philadelphia-to-Harrisburg  line  is  not 
untypical. If you build railroads—what we see now in New Jersey, 
there’s  a  line  that  goes  from  Camden  to  Trenton,  and  it  looked  a 
little bleak, in terms of passenger ridership in its opening days, but 
we’ve  seen  economic  development  crowding  over  to  get  near  that 
rail  spur,  and  we  see  it  throughout  New  Jersey.  New  Jersey  has 
the most-used mass transit system, on a relative basis, of any state 
in the country. And wherever we’ve brought in a new line or refur-
bished  a  line,  the  building  that  centers  around  that—people  are 
sick  and  tired  of  waiting  in  traffic  on  our  turnpike  and  our  other 
principal  highways.  So,  it  makes  a  huge  difference,  Governor.  And 
your  endorsement  is  critical.  And  I  know  that  your  colleagues  in 
the  Senate,  I’m  sure,  in  the  House,  as  well,  will  join  in  to  help  us 
form a cadre of people who will make sure that this job gets done. 

Senator Smith wanted to make a short statement. Please do. 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator  SMITH.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  appreciate  your 
holding  this  important  hearing  on  reauthorization,  but  I  specifi-
cally would like to welcome Kelly Taylor, who is the Administrator 
of  the  Oregon  Department  of  Transportation’s  Rail  Division.  I  ap-
preciate  very  much,  Kelly,  your  traveling  this  long  way  to  partici-
pate  in  this  hearing.  It’s  very  important,  I  know,  in  Oregon,  that 
the Cascade Line continues to exist. Its ridership is up. And I know 
people  appreciate  it  and  depend  upon  its  continuance.  So,  thank 
you for participating. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Senator Smith. 
If anyone has a question for Governor Rendell—and Senator Klo-
buchar, I made a commitment to the Governor that he’d be able to 
get  over  to  that  other  group  that  we  work  so  closely  with.  They’re 
one of the few groups that are smaller than the Senate. And so—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

power. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.—with  the  dimunitive  size,  they  gather 

And, Senator Carper, do you have a question that you’d like—— 
Senator CARPER. Yes. 
Governor Rendell, thank you for your enthusiastic support of our 
legislation  that  Senator  Lautenberg  and  Senator  Lott  have  really 
reintroduced from the last Congress. In the days when I was privi-
leged  to  serve  as  Governor  of  my  state,  we  were  faced,  at  times, 
with  making  capital  investments.  In  some  cases,  we  were  faced 
with  a  decision  as  to  whether  or  not  to  make  an  investment  to 
move  passengers  on  roads  or  by  rail.  And  if  we  decided  to  move 
them  by  roads,  the  Federal  Government  was  willing  to  pay  as 
much as—I think about 80 percent. If we decided to move them by 
rail, it was basically on our dime. And I often wondered if we some-
times we made the wrong decisions, given the fact that the—where 
the Federal dollars would reward us for highway, for road, but not 
for decisions to move passengers by rail. Your thoughts on that? 

Governor  RENDELL.  Well,  I  couldn’t  agree  more.  Senator  Casey 
and  I  were  just  discussing—we  would  love  to  have  a  rail  line  that 
goes from the—Wyoming Valley, Scranton, down to the Lehigh Val-
ley  and  over  to  the  Tube  to  get  into  New  York  City.  It  would  do 
wonders for us economically. In the Lehigh Valley, the popular will 
is  to  expand  a  road  called  ‘‘22’’  to—a  four-lane  highway—They 
want  to  expand  it  to  eight  lanes.  It  would  cost  infinitely  more,  in 
building  this  stretch  of  road.  But  unless  we  get  Federal  participa-
tion  in  the  rail  line,  which  would  be  much  more  cost-effective, 
much better for the environment, and much better for the Pennsyl-
vania  economy—unless  we  can  get  the  equivalent  Federal  share, 
we  can’t  go  forward.  And  it  makes  no  sense  at  all.  We’re  doing  so 
much  in  the—and  the  President  spoke  to  us  yesterday,  and  he  fi-
nally seems to be onboard on renewables and alternative fuels. He 
was talking about cellulosic ethanol, which is something we’re very 
interested,  in  Pennsylvania,  because  of  the  proliferation  of  wood 
chips and fiber and agricultural waste that we have, all these alter-
native fuels—the best alternative fuel is conservation, and the best 
way to conserve is mass transit. 

Senator  CARPER.  There  was  a  time,  in  the  last  decade—and,  ac-
tually,  sometime  before  that—when  the  Amtrak  board’s  member-
ship  included  a  Governor  nominated  by  the  President  and  con-
firmed by the—— 

Governor RENDELL. Governor Thompson, right? 
Senator CARPER. Thompson—Tommy served. I served for 4 years. 
Tommy  was  my  predecessor  and  my  successor,  as  it  turns  out.  I 
think, if truth be known, Governor Thompson would have preferred 
to  be  Secretary  of—or  President  of  Amtrak,  or  actually  Secretary 
of  Transportation,  as  opposed  to  being  Secretary  of  Health  and 
Human Services. 

One  of  the  ideas  that  both  Tommy  and  I  endorsed  was  a—the 
idea  of  providing  a  dedicated  source  of  capital  funding  for  pas-
senger  rail  service.  And  the  idea  that  we  nurtured  and  supported 
was to add a half cent to the Federal gas tax, to use that half cent 
just to provide for capital investments, not to be used on the oper-
ating  side,  but  just  on  the  capital  side.  I’m  not  going  to  ask  you, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

on the record, in terms of endorsing a half-cent increase in the gas 
tax to support passenger rail. I’ve done it, and survived quite nicely 
politically. But your thoughts for a dedicated source of capital fund-
ing  for—we’re  talking  about  selling  bonds,  issuing  bonds,  which  is 
really issuance of debt, and we pay the interest, and, you know, as 
is  explained  in  the  bill.  But  your  thoughts  for  a  dedicated  source 
of capital funding? 

Governor RENDELL. Well, I certainly endorse the way s. 294 does 
it, for the short run. And having the dedicated tax set aside on part 
of the gas tax, we cannot do that in Pennsylvania, with our gas tax. 
Our  State  constitution  says  it  has  to  go  to  highways  and  bridges 
and roads. But I would think that that would be a good idea. 

Interestingly, we had a discussion at the NGA about—with some 
financiers from Wall Street, about their reluctance to finance large- 
ticket  items—$200,  $300,  $400  million  items—for  renewable  en-
ergy.  And  they  said  one  of  the  reluctance—forms  of  reluctance  is 
because  the  oil  cartel  could  always—seeing  some  of  these  projects 
getting  off  the  board,  drop  their  prices  again  and  just  price  them 
out.  One,  I  don’t  think  that’s  possible  anymore,  because  they  have 
to  drill  so  deep  to  get  the  oil  supply;  they  don’t  have  the  luxury  of 
dropping  prices  just  at  whim.  But,  two,  we  all  agreed,  at  least  at 
that meeting, there should be some floor on what gasoline sells for 
in  the  United  States  of  America.  I  know  some  of  the  consumers 
wouldn’t want to necessarily hear that, but that’s the best thing for 
us  to  achieve  all  of  our  goals.  And  having  a  floor  on  the  price  of 
gasoline is very much similar to what you said. 

Using  that  asset  to  help  us  build  other  assets  to  avoid  conges-
tion, to avoid pollution to our environment, I think that’s a terrific 
idea. 

Senator  CARPER.  Thank  you  very,  very  much.  Good  to  see  you. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thanks  very  much,  Governor.  And  I—be-
fore you go, I don’t know whether, Senator Klobuchar, you had any 
remarks. 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  I  wanted  to  say  hello  to  Governor  Rendell. 
We  are  both  former  prosecutors,  and  I’ve  met  him  a  number  of 
times. And thank you for being here. And then, go off to your very 
important—— 

Governor  RENDELL.  Well,  I  was—for  me,  that  was  a  long  time 

ago. 

[Laughter.] 
Governor  RENDELL.  It—almost  along—I’m—it’s  longer  than  the 

time that I used to drive a car. So—— 

[Laughter.] 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Very good. 
Governor RENDELL. Good to see you. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  For  me,  everything  was  a  long  time  ago. 
[Laughter.] 
Governor RENDELL. That’s right. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  But  I—as  you  leave,  Governor  Rendell,  I 
remind  the  panel  that  if  you  want  to  go  from  Brussels,  where  we 
had NATO headquarters, to Paris, distance about the same as from 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

New York City to here, an hour and 20 minutes, and I rode in the 
cab of the train so they could show me TGV and how it operates— 
so rapid that the signage is on the dashboard, because you couldn’t 
catch  it  on  the—if  it  was  stationary  on—but  you  can’t  find  an  air-
plane  that  will  take  you  from  Paris  to  Brussels,  or  vice  versa.  The 
trip  is  too  easy  by  train.  And  we  ought  to  replicate  that  in 
some—— 

Governor  RENDELL.  Anything  under  500  miles  ought  to  be  rail. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Right. Thank you. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. And now for the other members—— 
Do you want to make—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Yes. 
Senator LAUTENBERG.—a statement? 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  I  just  had  a  few  questions  of  the  other 

members. 

tify first. 

tified. So—— 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  would  like  to  give  them  a  chance  to  tes-

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. All right. I didn’t know they hadn’t tes-

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Very good. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. It just felt like it. 
But the other witnesses here bring a thoughtful view on this, and 

we’re pleased to hear them—hear from them. 

And, Mr. Boardman, thank you for being here, and we invite you 
now—we  try  to  stick  to  a  5-minute  summary  statement.  We  don’t 
slam the gavel, but—if you can, please. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOSEPH H. BOARDMAN, 

ADMINISTRATOR, FEDERAL RAILROAD ADMINISTRATION 
Mr. BOARDMAN. Mr. Chairman, Ranking Member Smith, I appre-
ciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today  on  behalf  of  Sec-
retary of Transportation Mary Peters and the Bush Administration 
to discuss the reauthorization of Amtrak and the future of intercity 
passenger rail here in the United States. 

The Administration believes that intercity passenger rail must be 
a  cost-effective  provider  of  transportation  services  for  it  to  achieve 
its  potential  of  playing  an  increasingly  more  important  role  in  our 
national  transportation  system.  The  Administration  believes  that 
Federal  operating  subsidies  should  be  eliminated  within  the  next 
few  years.  S.  294  does  not  align  with  this  position;  instead, 
ramping  up  Amtrak’s  Federal  subsidy  in  excess  of  Amtrak’s  own 
estimate of needs. 

A  strong,  unified  board  of  directors  is  critical  for  making  the 
changes  at  Amtrak  will  achieve  sound  economics.  S.  294  proposes 
changes  that  could  result  in  political  deadlock  and  an  inability  to 
provide decisive leadership. 

The Administration recognizes and supports your proposal to re-
quire  accurate  accounting  of  revenue  and  expenses,  and  is  aligned 
with  S.  294  in  that  regard.  I  believe  developing  metrics  and  min-
imum standards for measuring performance and service quality, in 
consultation  with  the  STB,  is  an  important  step  toward  account-
ability.  The  steps  you  have  taken  to  ensure  that  it’s  meaningful, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

such as withholding funds based on substandard performance, will 
help  ensure  accountability,  as  well.  But  we  would  like  S.  294  to 
also  spell  out  the  goals  to  be  achieved,  including  that  the  Federal 
operating subsidy is to be eliminated. 

The  Administration  is  open  to  acceptable  approaches  that 
achieve the goal of preventing tradeoffs and distractions that nega-
tively  impact  focus  on  maintaining  owned  or  controlled  infrastruc-
ture—operating  trains  on  time,  cost-effectively,  and  with  the  high-
est  standards  of  safety—and  the  development  of  management  and 
technical  resources  needed  to  carry  this  out.  It’s  the  basis  of  the 
transition to a pure operating company. 

S.  294  aligns  with  this  provision  of  improving  accounting  and 
providing that funds cannot be moved among accounts without ap-
proval  of  the  Secretary,  but  it  does  not  provide  enough  structure 
or incentive for the focus needed on the core functions. 

The Administration envisions a system where states can contract 
with a train-operating company based on cost and performance cri-
teria.  S.  294  moves  in  that  direction,  but  not  with  enough  state 
flexibility  for  true  managed  competition  to  occur.  States  need  a 
level  playing  field  where  they  can  have  a  range  of  available  op-
tions.  For  example,  section  218  would  establish  a  mechanism  for 
States  to  acquire  access  to  Amtrak-controlled  equipment  if  the 
state  selects  an  entity  other  than  Amtrak  to  provide  intercity  pas-
senger rail service. And we think it’s important language. But that 
may  also  need  appropriate  Federal  oversight  to  ensure  that  it  is 
meaningful. We are open to discussing more flexible language. 

The Administration believes that we have a great opportunity to 
forge  long-term  partnerships  between  states  and  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment with S. 294. Rail planning needs to become part of the an-
nual  transportation  improvement  program  that  each  state  is  re-
quired  to  do.  The  language  of  this  bill  could  make  major  improve-
ments  in  state  corridor  planning  and  future  rail  investment  if 
you’re  willing  to  incorporate  capital  planning  requirements  on 
State DOTs into their annual STIP. 

The Administration believes that a new partnership is needed to 
manage  the  capital  assets  on  the  Northeast  Corridor.  Section  213 
of  S.  294  requires  Amtrak,  in  consultation  with  the  USDOT  and 
the States, to develop a capital spending plan to return the North-
east Corridor to a state of good repair. That’s a great reinforcement 
to the FY 2006 grant agreement. Section 214 would establish advi-
sory committees to promote cooperation in the planning and invest-
ment on the Northeast Corridor and reinforces the STB’s authority 
over  new  usage  agreements  between  Amtrak  and  the  commuter 
rail operators. 

But  I  believe  we  need  a  decisionmaking  body  to  control  the 
Northeast  Corridor,  with  representatives  of  the  Federal  Govern-
ment, the eight States, and the District of Columbia. But I also be-
lieve that you must have skin in the game to make it work. Every-
body must put their money on the table if they want a chair at that 
table.  That  does  not  exist  in  any  proposals,  and  it  will  be  a 
daunting task, but, without it, progress will suffer. 

S. 294 is a complex bill that reflects dedicated and thoughtful au-
thors.  Secretary  Peters  and  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

develop consensus legislation that will become the foundation for a 
robust and successful intercity passenger rail system. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Boardman follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOSEPH H. BOARDMAN, ADMINISTRATOR, 

FEDERAL RAILROAD ADMINISTRATION 

Mr.  Chairman,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  appear 
before you today on behalf of Secretary of Transportation Mary Peters and the Bush 
Administration to discuss the reauthorization of Amtrak and the future of intercity 
passenger rail service in the United States. 

This hearing is particularly timely. If the Congress and the Administration cannot 
agree on legislation authorizing Amtrak and the Federal role in intercity passenger 
rail  service,  October  1  will  mark  the  beginning  of  the  sixth  year  since  the  end  of 
the  authorization  of  appropriations  contained  in  the  Amtrak  Reform  and  Account-
ability Act of 1997. Unfortunately, operating without authorization, other than that 
conferred  by  annual  appropriations  acts,  is  not  the  exception  for  Amtrak  but  is  in-
creasingly  becoming  the  rule.  Over  the  last  25  years,  Amtrak  has  had  to  rely  on 
appropriators rather than authorizers for intercity passenger rail service authoriza-
tion  about  40  percent  of  the  time.  Thus,  Secretary  Peters  and  I  both  hope  that  the 
Congress  and  the  Administration  can  reach  a  consensus  on  intercity  passenger  rail 
policy, if not in this session, then certainly during the 110th Congress. 

However,  our  overall  assessment  of  S.  294  is  that  it  does  not  include  enough 
meaningful  reforms.  Amtrak  is  an  outdated  monopoly  that  is  based  on  a  flawed 
business  model.  It  does  not  provide  an  acceptable  level  of  service,  nor  has  it  been 
able to control its finances. Our goal is improve the Nation’s intercity passenger sys-
tem  to  make  it  responsive  to  the  needs  of  the  traveling  public,  state  and  local  gov-
ernments,  and  ultimately  to  the  taxpayers.  To  accomplish  this,  we  urge  the  Con-
gress to pass legislation that reflects the core reform principles originally presented 
by  Secretary  Mineta.  Passing  an  authorization  that  does  not  fundamentally  reform 
Amtrak—but  provides  a  higher  level  of  Federal  subsidy  for  it—is  not  an  acceptable 
outcome. 
The Administration’s View On Intercity Passenger Rail Reform 

It’s been nearly 5 years since then-Secretary of Transportation Norman Y. Mineta 
presented the Bush Administration’s five principles for intercity passenger rail serv-
ice reform. These principles are: 

1. Create a system driven by sound economics. 
2. Require that Amtrak transition to a pure operating company. 
3. Introduce carefully managed competition to provide higher quality service at 
reasonable prices. 
4.  Establish  a  long-term  partnership  between  states  and  the  Federal  Govern-
ment to support intercity passenger rail service. 
5. Create an effective partnership, after a reasonable transition, to manage the 
capital assets of the Northeast Corridor. 

The Administration proposed legislation in 2003 and 2005, the Passenger Rail In-
vestment  Reform  Act  (PRIRA),  to  implement  these  principles.  While  PRIRA  is  one 
way to implement the principles, Secretary Mineta maintained that PRIRA was not 
the  only  way  to  achieve  these  goals.  He  consistently  expressed  his  willingness  to 
work with the Congress to develop meaningful intercity passenger rail reform legis-
lation  acceptable  to  both  the  Congress  and  the  Administration.  Secretary  Peters 
shares  this  view.  However,  she  believes,  as  do  I,  that  the  principles  articulated  by 
Secretary  Mineta  in  2002  must  still  be  addressed  by  any  Amtrak  reauthorization 
legislation that we could recommend that the President sign. It is from that perspec-
tive  that  I  offer  some  general  comments  on  S.  294,  the  Rail  Investment  and  Im-
provement Act. 
Observations on S. 294 

To  provide  structure,  these  comments  are  organized  by  the  Administration’s  five 

principles of reform. 
Create a System Driven by Sound Economics 

The  Administration  believes  that  intercity  passenger  rail  must  be  a  cost-effective 
provider  of  transportation  services  for  it  to  achieve  its  potential  of  playing  an  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

creasingly  more  important  role  in  our  national  transportation  system.  Regular  re-
ports  by  the  Government  Accountability  Office,  the  Department  of  Transportation’s 
Inspector General and Amtrak’s own Inspector General have identified how Amtrak 
has  lost  the  focus  of  its  statutory  mandate  to  ‘‘. . .  be  operated  and  managed  as  a 
for-profit corporation . . .’’ (49 U.S.C. 24301(a)(2)). Instead, we have been faced with 
circumstances where 10 percent or more of the Federal subsidy for Amtrak has gone 
to underwrite its food and beverage service while much needed long-term capital im-
provements to nationally-important infrastructure have been deferred. 

It is for this reason, the Administration believes that intercity passenger rail serv-
ice must be operated like a business, with priority placed upon the financial bottom 
line.  Nothing  in  this  testimony  should  be  taken  as  criticism  of  Amtrak’s  current 
Board of Directors and management who are addressing the Corporation’s financial 
performance  on  both  the  revenue  and  expense  sides  of  the  ledger.  There  has  been 
progress  but  this  can  only  be  viewed  as  a  beginning  effort  that  must  be  sustained. 
It  is  thus  as  both  a  goal  and  an  incentive  that  the  Administration  continues  to  be-
lieve  that  Federal  operating  subsidies  should  be  eliminated  within  the  next  few 
years. 

S.  294  does  not  align  with  the  Administration’s  vision  on  this  issue.  Overall,  the 
bill  authorizes  approximately  $2  billion  annually  for  Amtrak,  which  represents  a 
significant  increase  over  its  current  subsidy.  The  bill  offers  no  programmatic  jus-
tification for why this amount is needed or how Amtrak should or could spend these 
sums.  Beyond  the  fact  that  the  bill  authorizes  funding  in  excess  of  even  Amtrak’s 
own  estimate  of  needs  (by  several  hundred  million  dollars),  authorizing  such  levels 
undermines the incentive for the railroad to become more efficient and business like. 
Amtrak  needs  to  be  held  accountable  for  its  well-documented  inability  to  control 
costs and manage its operations. If the goal is to make Amtrak more fiscally respon-
sible and self sufficient, ramping up its Federal subsidy would send the wrong mes-
sage. 

A  key  need  of  any  private  successful  business  is  to  make  decisions  on  when  to 
enter or leave markets based upon economics and not government policy. The rees-
tablishment  of  a  ‘‘National  Rail  Passenger  System’’  in  section  201,  would  work 
against  this  end.  Specifically,  the  Administration  finds  it  unacceptable  to  continue 
to subsidize poor performing, under-utilized long-distance routes that lose hundreds 
of millions of dollars annually. The maintenance of a static nationwide network has 
been  routinely  cited  as  a  major  flaw  of  Amtrak’s  business  model.  As  the  GAO  re-
cently  reported,  long-distance  trains  ‘‘show  limited  public  benefits  for  dollars  ex-
pended,’’  and  that  ‘‘these  routes  account  for  15  percent  of  riders  but  80  percent  of 
financial losses.’’ Rationalizing the route structure must be a key element of any re-
authorization legislation. 

Furthermore, the chances of creating a system driven by sound economics will be 
undermined  by  altering  the  structure  of  Amtrak’s  board  of  directors.  The  bill  pro-
poses  comprising  the  board  with  equal  numbers  of  members  from  each  political 
party, all of whom must be vetted through the Congress. Introducing overt partisan-
ship  into  the  selection  process  would  increase  the  chances  the  board  would  become 
deadlocked  on  issues  and  unable  to  provide  decisive  leadership  for  the  company.  A 
strong unified board is critical for making changes at Amtrak. 

On the other hand, the establishment of an improved financial accounting system 
(section 203), recognizes that all businesses need to have accurate accounting of rev-
enue  and  expenses,  not  just  for  the  benefit  of  the  independent  auditors  and  share-
holders, but for management to make critical business decisions. Work is underway 
in  developing  such  systems  at  Amtrak  and  FRA  and  this  section  is  welcomed  rein-
forcement. 

Perhaps the greatest opportunity to align S. 294 with the Administration’s vision 
of  intercity  passenger  rail  can  be  found  in  section  208  where  FRA  and  Amtrak,  in 
consultation  with  the  Surface  Transportation  Board  and  others,  would  be  directed 
to  develop  metrics  and  minimum  standards  for  measuring  performance  and  service 
quality.  Elsewhere  (section  210)  S.  294  would  provide  that  FRA  could  withhold 
funds  from  routes  based  upon  substandard  performance  against  these  standards. 
The issue that needs to be addressed to make section 208 meaningful is for the Act 
to  spell  out  the  goals  to  be  achieved.  The  Administration  believes  that  such  goals 
should  include  elimination  of  Federal  operating  subsidy  and  in  the  interim,  maxi-
mizing  transportation  benefit  per  dollar  of  Federal  subsidy.  Performance  measures 
alone will not address these issues, however. Legislation must ensure that the rail-
road’s purpose and design allow it to make decisions based on sound economics. 
Require That Amtrak Transition to a Pure Operating Company 

The management of Amtrak has three significant challenges—operating trains in 
a  safe  and  cost  effective  manner;  maintaining  infrastructure  essential  for  intercity, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

commuter,  and  freight  rail  transportation;  and  developing  both  internal  and  exter-
nal resources to get this done. History has shown that these are three difficult chal-
lenges  to  juggle  regardless  of  the  skill  and  good  intentions  of  those  in  Amtrak’s 
management.  The  most  frequent  results  are  priorities  and  tradeoffs  that  push  both 
service and infrastructure in the direction of marginally ‘‘good enough.’’ 

The  Administration  believes  that  the  infrastructure  owned  by  Amtrak,  particu-
larly the Northeast Corridor and Chicago Union Station, is too important to be sub-
jected  to  such  tradeoffs.  It  appears  that  S.  294  recognizes  this  concern.  The  im-
proved accounting system required in section 203 is intended to be able to ‘‘. . . ag-
gregate  expenses  and  revenues  to  infrastructure  and  distinguish  them  from  ex-
penses  and  revenues  related  to  rail  operations.’’  In  describing  the  grant  process  in 
section  205,  the  bill  provides  that  funds  cannot  be  moved  among  accounts—effec-
tively  preventing  the  use  of  capital  funds  for  operating  expenses—without  the  ap-
proval of the Secretary. 

The  Administration  believes  that  to  improve  operating  performance,  Amtrak 
needs  to  shed  its  responsibilities  for  maintaining  capital  infrastructure.  This  way 
Amtrak  could  focus  on  its  core  functions  with  dedicated  funds.  We  have  previously 
presented a plan for accomplishing this goal, though as you know we would be open 
to other approaches that achieve the same ends. 
Introduce  Carefully  Managed  Competition  To  Provide  Higher  Quality  Service  at 

Reasonable Prices 

A fundamental underpinning of the Administration’s vision for the future of inter-
city passenger rail service is to create opportunities for competition by allowing new 
operating  companies  to  compete  for  service  contracts  with  States,  groups  of  States, 
and  regional  authorities  to  operate  the  trains  they  believe  important.  Competition 
will help control costs and improve service quality. I recognize that some have said 
that such competition would not work in the passenger rail industry. This is belied, 
however,  by  the  relatively  robust  competitive  environment  that  has  developed  for 
the  operation  of  commuter  trains  in  recent  years.  Having  states,  groups  of  states, 
or  regional  authorities  award  contracts  for  passenger  service  would  bring  decisions 
about  how  much  of  which  services  to  buy  much  closer  to  the  customers  for  those 
services. That, too, should result in better service. 

S.  294  provides  some  opportunities  for  competition.  For  example,  section  211 
would permit FRA to select rail carriers that own infrastructure over which Amtrak 
operates to be considered as a passenger rail service provider, excluding many other 
potentially qualified operators including states themselves. Section 218 would estab-
lish a mechanism for States to acquire access to Amtrak-controlled equipment if the 
State selects an entity other than Amtrak to provide intercity passenger rail service. 
In  section  301  (which  proposes  a  new  section  24402(b)(3)  in  Title  49),  an  applicant 
for a Federal/State passenger rail capital grant would have to provide a written jus-
tification to the Secretary if a proposed operator of the service was not selected com-
petitively.  While  these  sections  move  in  the  right  direction,  overall,  the  competitive 
balance is still in Amtrak’s favor. Except for the infrastructure owner, State selected 
competitors  would  not  have  the  same  right  of  access  to  the  rail  infrastructure  as 
Amtrak  and  would  not  have  access  to  the  Federal  subsidies  made  available  for 
intercity  passenger  rail  service  except  that  limited  amount  available  through  the 
proposed State grant program. S. 294 needs to establish a more comprehensive and 
level competitive environment. The Administration envisions a system where states 
can contract with a company, potentially including Amtrak itself, based on cost and 
performance  criteria.  Having  a  range  of  available  competitors  available  is  key  to 
making managed competition produce improved system performance. 
Establish  a  Long-Term  Partnership  Between  States  and  the  Federal  Government  To 

Support Intercity Passenger Rail Service 

Most publicly supported transportation in the U.S. is undertaken through a part-
nership  between  the  Federal  Government  and  the  States.  This  model,  which  has 
worked  well  for  generations  for  highways  and  transit  and  airports,  places  the 
States, and in certain cases their subdivisions, at the forefront of planning and deci-
sion-making.  States  are  uniquely  qualified  to  understand  their  mobility  needs  and 
connectivity requirements through statewide and metropolitan area intermodal and 
multimodal  transportation  planning  funded,  in  part,  by  the  U.S.  Department  of 
Transportation. 

While intercity passenger rail has historically been an exception to the application 
of  this  successful  model,  in  recent  years  some  states  have  taken  an  active  role  in 
their  rail  transportation  services.  Several  states  have  chosen  to  invest  in  intercity 
passenger  rail  service  provided  by  Amtrak  as  part  of  strategies  to  meet  their  pas-
senger mobility needs. Over the past 10 years, ridership on intercity passenger rail 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

routes  that  benefit  from  state  support  has  grown  by  73  percent.  Over  that  same 
time  period,  ridership  on  Amtrak  routes  not  supported  by  states  has  increased  by 
only 7 percent. In discussions with interested states, the U.S. Department of Trans-
portation has found that the greatest single impediment to implementing this initia-
tive is the lack of a Federal/State partnership, similar to that which exists for high-
ways and transit, for investing in the capital needs of intercity passenger rail. 

S.  294  recognizes  an  important  role  for  the  states  in  section  302  by  requiring  de-
velopment of State rail plans and in section 301 by establishing a program matching 
Federal/State  grants  for  intercity  passenger  rail  capital  investment.  While  a  start 
in  the  right  direction,  the  Administration  believes  that  a  larger  and  stronger  role 
needs to be established for the states. Like the Federal Transit grants, we strongly 
urge  that  the  state  matching  requirement  be  increased  to  50  percent.  This  would 
ensure a state’s full commitment to a project and would make states more account-
able for selecting a well-justified project. The state planning provision in section 203 
is established as a stand alone rail planning effort. Planning for rail transportation 
needs  to  be  fully  integrated  in  the  multimodal  state-wide  planning  that  states  al-
ready undertake under 23 U.S.C. 135. It is essential, in my opinion, that states con-
sider all modes when undertaking mobility planning and select the investments that 
best meet their mobility needs regardless of the mode. 

Decisions  on  where  intercity  passenger  rail  service  should  be  operated,  and  the 
schedules and attributes of this service should flow from this state planning and in-
formed decision-making and not the corporate offices of Amtrak. While establishing 
a  Federal/State  capital  program,  section  101(c)  relegates  this  program  to  a  sec-
ondary importance by continuing to provide the lion’s share of available Federal cap-
ital  to  Amtrak  directly  instead  of  to  the  states.  The  Administration  believes  that 
most  if  not  all  of  the  capital  designed  for  intercity  passenger  rail  improvements 
should  flow  through  the  states  who  are  in  the  best  position  to  know  about  mobility 
needs. 

We  fully  support  creating  a  Federal-State  partnership  for  investing  in  capital  in-
frastructure. However, the framework presented in this bill gives too little responsi-
bility  to  the  States,  while  continuing  to  funnel  most  capital  funding  through  Am-
trak.  Instead,  states  should  be  empowered  to  decide  how  best  to  invest  in  intercity 
passenger rail facilities. 
Create  an  Effective  Partnership,  After  a  Reasonable  Transition,  To  Manage  the 

Capital Assets of the Northeast Corridor 

As discussed earlier, the Northeast Corridor infrastructure places significant bur-
dens  on  Amtrak’s  management.  Moreover,  this  is  an  essential  transportation  asset 
needed by commuters and freight carriers as well as Amtrak. It should be managed 
for  the  benefit  of  the  region’s  transportation  needs  and  not  corporate  priorities  and 
the short-term financial fortunes of one should not affect the operations of all. Deci-
sions  on  essential  infrastructure  replacements  and  improvements  should  not  have 
to compete, as they do today, with decisions on what will be served on Amtrak’s din-
ing cars. 

S. 294 makes some modest movement in this direction. Section 213 requires Am-
trak, in consultation with the USDOT and the States, to develop a capital spending 
plan  to  return  the  Northeast  Corridor  to  a  state  of  good  repair.  This  is  similar  to 
a  condition  I  required  in  Amtrak’s  FY  2006  grant  agreement  and  I  appreciate  the 
reinforcement  that  comes  from  inclusion  of  this  provision  in  the  bill.  Section  214 
would establish advisory committees to promote cooperation in the planning and in-
vestment  on  the  NEC  and  reinforces  the  STB’s  authority  over  new  usage  agree-
ments  between  Amtrak  and  the  commuter  rail  operators.  I  believe,  however,  based 
upon my past career in State transportation, that more is needed to keep the States 
from  being  reluctant  partners  in  making  the  investments  needed  to  preserve  and 
improve  the  Corridor.  I  recognize  that  creating  a  decision-making  body  to  control 
the  Northeast  Corridor  with  representatives  of  the  Federal  Government,  eight 
States  and  the  District  of  Columbia  will  be  a  daunting  task,  but  this  is  what  is 
needed. 
Amtrak Debt 

The Administration believes that Amtrak’s debt is a private corporate matter and 
should  remain  so.  A  quarter  of  a  century  ago,  Congress  relieved  Amtrak  of  more 
than  a  billion  dollars  of  debt  without  improving  matters  noticeably.  Amtrak  simply 
incurred  even  more  debt.  The  Administration  strongly  opposes  any  attempts  to 
transfer  Amtrak’s  debt  onto  the  U.S.  Treasury.  Amtrak,  which  incurred  its  debt 
independently and beyond the oversight of the government, must be responsible for 
retiring any debt using all the resources it has available. Amtrak has over $3 billion 
in  revenue  annually  and  therefore  has  the  wherewithal  to  address  its  debt  without 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

special  assistance  from  the  U.S.  Government.  Amtrak’s  debt  should  not  be  mis-
understood to be a de facto obligation of the Federal Government. Furthermore, the 
Administration  does  not  believe  that  the  bill  should  include  a  mechanism  that 
would allow Amtrak to incur new government-backed debt. 
Other Provisions 

At  two  locations,  section  101(d)  and  in  section  301  (where  it  would  create  a  new 
section  24403  in  Title  49),  S.  294  recognizes  that  the  Department  and  FRA  require 
fiscal resources to oversee implementation of intercity passenger rail capital projects 
and gives FRA the authority to retain a portion of the funds authorized to help fund 
such oversight. This authority is much needed and is in accord with the Administra-
tion’s views. 

Title IV would include in this legislation the ‘‘Surface Transportation and Rail Se-
curity Act of 2007.’’ On February 2, 2007, the Acting General Counsel of the Depart-
ment  of  Transportation  provided  the  Department’s  views  on  this  legislation  to 
Chairman and Ranking Member of the full Committee. I wish to incorporate her let-
ter into this testimony by reference. 

The  foregoing  comments  reflect  a  high  level  view  of  major  provisions  of  S.  294. 
By  all  means  these  comments  should  not  be  considered  comprehensive  or  the  ab-
sence  of  a  comment  on  a  particular  section  be  interpreted  as  Administration  sup-
port. Staff from the Department and FRA will be available to provide more detailed 
comments to the staff of this Committee at their convenience. 

S.  294  is  a  complex  bill  that  reflects  much  work  and  thoughtful  consideration  by 
the  bill’s  authors.  However,  it  falls  short  of  making  necessary  reforms  identified  by 
the  Administration  and  other  independent  experts.  Without  the  changes  we  have 
identified, we have serious reservations with the bill. 

Secretary Peters and I look forward to a continuing dialogue with this Committee 
to develop a much needed consensus that can be embraced by the Congress and the 
Administration. 

I  appreciate  your  attention  and  would  be  happy  to  answer  questions  that  you 

might have. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much, Mr. Boardman. 
We’d like, now, to hear from Ms. Taylor. If you would, please. 
STATEMENT OF KELLY TAYLOR, ADMINISTRATOR, OREGON 

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION RAIL DIVISION 

Ms.  TAYLOR.  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Senator  Smith,  members  of 
the  Committee,  I’m  Kelly  Taylor,  with  the  Oregon  Department  of 
Transportation  Rail  Division,  and  I’m  responsible  for  both  pas-
senger  and  freight  rail  programs,  including  the  Amtrak  Cascades 
program. 

The  Amtrak  Cascades  is  on  the  Northwest  high-speed  rail  cor-
ridor  that  goes  between  Eugene,  Oregon,  and  Vancouver,  British 
Columbia,  and  it’s  a  partnership  that’s  been  going  on  very  favor-
ably  between  Washington,  Oregon,  and  Amtrak.  We  each  pay  a 
proportional share of that service. 

Now,  Oregon  only  has  two  trains,  at  this  moment,  that  run  be-
tween Eugene and Portland that are State-sponsored. But both Or-
egon and Washington have long-range plans that would expand the 
service.  But  there  are  obstacles  to  getting  there.  For  example,  we 
invested  about  $30  million  with  Union  Pacific’s  system,  which  our 
Amtrak runs on, in order to get those first two trains going. If I’m 
to add up to the five trains we’d like to do, I will need more money 
in  order  to  make  those  investments  on  the  Union  Pacific  railroad 
system,  because  they  don’t  want  the  passenger  trains—they  need 
the passenger trains and the freight trains to run together, and not 
impact each other. 

Now, the Cascades has been a very popular travel choice. You’re 
absolutely  right,  Senator,  people  will  come  when  you  build  it.  In 
the last decade, since we’ve had the two trains, ridership has quad-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

rupled  in  Oregon.  And  our  corridor,  the  Cascades  Corridor,  is  the 
seventh  heaviest  traveled  corridor  in  the  country.  So,  you’re  right, 
if  you  build  it,  they  will  come.  And  they  want  it.  But  what  people 
want is reduced travel time, they want increased frequency of train 
options to choose from for schedule, and they want it to be reliable. 
And,  unfortunately,  the  on-time  performance  is  one  of  the  things 
that we’ve got a problem with. Our Cascades, in the last year, has 
been  about  51  percent  on  time.  And,  frankly,  I  just  heard  from  a 
gentlemen who wrote me and said, ‘‘You know, I get so frustrated. 
I’ve  ridden  the  train  ten  times,  and  each  time  it  has  been  late.’’ 
Well,  you  have  to  admire  that  man’s  tenacity.  He  wants  to  ride 
that  train,  and  he’s  willing  to  get  on  it—even  when  he  knows  the 
last ten times it’s been late, he wants to ride it. So, we make these 
investments, people will ride it, and more people will come. 

In  Oregon,  we’re  projected  to  get  a  million  people  more  in  the 
Portland metropolitan area over the next 25 years, and, across the 
country,  freight  tonnage  is  supposed  to  double.  Well,  even  with  all 
the  highway  capacity  projects  we’ll  do,  it’s  not  going  to  be  enough. 
No  one  mode  can  do  it  alone.  It  is  a  transportation  system,  and  it 
takes  all  the  components  to  make  it  work.  It’s  like  when  I  look  at 
a  map,  and  I  see  all  the  roads  and  the  trains  and  the  rivers,  it’s 
a circulatory system, and that circulatory system is what drives our 
economic  vitality.  And  if  you  neglect  a  part  or  you  let  it  wither, 
then  that  part  of  the  body  withers  along  with  it.  So,  we  have  got 
to invest. 

And  the  one  piece  that  I  think—we  love  this  bill,  Senator  Lau-
tenberg. We just think it’s a wonderful bill. We need passenger rail. 
Amtrak has been a great partner for us, and I think Amtrak needs 
to stay the national passenger rail service. Our State does not have 
the  resources,  nor  the  appetite  to  take  that  responsibility  on.  So, 
the  part  of  this  bill  that  keeps  Amtrak  going  is  fabulous.  The  part 
that has the Federal capital matching program is fabulous, because 
that’s  the  piece  we  need.  We  need  a  strong  Federal  partnership  to 
help  us  leverage  the  dollars  we  have,  and  we  will  have,  in  order 
to make those investments, in order for me to grow from two trains 
to the five trains. We’ve done the study. We could do five trains in 
the  valley.  They’ll  pay  for  themselves,  they’ll  come  close  to  cutting 
the cost—or paying for the cost. 

So,  again,  I  think  that  the  passenger  rail  system—there  are 
issues.  We  share  it  with  the  freight  trains.  We  need  to  make  the 
investment  so  that  they  don’t  have  to  pull  off  into  the  sidings  and 
wait  for  the  long  freight  trains  to  go  by,  so  they  can  keep  up  the 
reliability and the travel time. 

But,  sir,  this  is  a  fabulous  bill.  We  very  much  support  it.  I  am 
honored  to  be  here  to  represent  my  State.  Senator  Smith,  thank 
you. And I’ll conclude with that. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Taylor follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF KELLY TAYLOR, ADMINISTRATOR, 
OREGON DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION RAIL DIVISION 

Chairman  Lautenberg,  Senator  Smith,  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  my 
name  is  Kelly  Taylor,  and  I  serve  as  Administrator  of  the  Oregon  Department  of 
Transportation (ODOT) Rail Division. In this capacity I have responsibility for over-
seeing the State of Oregon’s passenger and freight rail initiatives, including the Cas-
cades  Amtrak  service  along  the  Northwest’s  high-speed  rail  corridor.  ODOT  is  very 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

supportive of the Passenger Rail Investment and Improvement Act of 2007 (S. 294), 
and  I  want  to  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  you  about  the  North-
west’s successful model of providing passenger rail service and discuss how this leg-
islation would benefit our efforts. 
The Northwest Rail Corridor 

The Cascades Amtrak service runs 466 miles along the federally-designated high- 
speed  rail  corridor  from  Eugene,  Oregon  through  Portland  and  Seattle-Tacoma  to 
Vancouver,  British  Columbia.  While  Oregon  and  Washington  pay  for  the  Cascades 
service, it is operated by Amtrak. This arrangement has proven to be a very success-
ful  partnership  between  two  states,  Amtrak,  freight  railroads,  and  local  commu-
nities, and it is often held up as a national model for passenger rail service. Oregon 
pays  for  Amtrak  to  operate  two  round  trips  daily  between  the  state’s  two  largest 
urban  areas,  Eugene  and  Portland  (and  through  its  third  largest  urban  area, 
Salem), while Washington pays for three daily trains between Portland and Seattle 
and  two  round  trips  between  Seattle  and  Bellingham,  with  one  extension  to  Van-
couver,  B.C.  Amtrak  pays  for  one  daily  roundtrip  train  between  Portland  and  Se-
attle. 

Ridership on the Oregon segment between Portland and Eugene has nearly quad-
rupled  since  it  was  initiated  in  1994,  rising  to  over  130,000  passengers  in  2006. 
Total ridership on the Cascades trains reached 627,664 passengers in 2006, making 
the Amtrak Cascades the seventh most heavily traveled corridor in the country. 

Amtrak’s  Coast  Starlight  train  also  provides  long-distance  service  along  this  cor-
ridor between Seattle and Los Angeles and serves an additional 330,000 passengers 
annually.  Long-distance  trains  like  the  Coast  Starlight  provide  an  essential  trans-
portation  service  for  many  communities  and  to  a  significant  percentage  of  the  gen-
eral  public.  Many  long-distance  trains  serve  small  communities  with  limited  or  no 
significant  air  or  bus  service,  especially  in  remote  or  isolated  areas  in  the  United 
States. 

Oregon helps sponsor passenger rail service because we believe it is an important 
part of the regional transportation system, and we believe that further investments 
can  increase  the  role  passenger  rail  plays  in  this  corridor.  The  Cascades  Amtrak 
service  runs  along  a  rail  line  that  parallels  Interstate  5,  the  most  important  route 
for  the  movement  of  people  and  goods  among  the  West  Coast  states  and  with  our 
trading partners in Canada and Mexico. Interstate 5 is particularly important in the 
Northwest and helps bind together the closely-knit economies of Oregon and Wash-
ington,  providing  a  safe  and  efficient  route  for  the  movement  of  freight  and  people. 
Nearly 70 percent of the population of Oregon and Washington lives within a few 
miles  of  the  Northwest  high-speed  rail  corridor  and  Interstate  5,  and  much  of  the 
new  population  moving  into  the  Northwest  is  settling  along  this  corridor  as  well. 
As  a  result,  traffic  on  Interstate  5,  both  within  metropolitan  areas  as  well  as  be-
tween  them,  is  growing  rapidly,  and  congestion  has  become  a  significant  problem 
on  the  Interstate  5  corridor.  Between  Salem  and  Portland,  the  number  of  cars  on 
Interstate 5 jumped by nearly 25 percent in just a decade, and we expect this trend 
to continue as the Portland metropolitan region gains another million people in the 
next 25 years. 

Unfortunately,  Oregon  has  not  been  able  to  add  lane  miles  to  the  Interstate  fast 
enough  to  keep  up  with  the  growth  in  traffic.  Federal  and  state  highway  funding 
have  increased  only  modestly  because  neither  Oregon  nor  the  Federal  Government 
has raised the gas tax since 1993, and an increasing share of highway funds is need-
ed  just  to  preserve  aging  infrastructure.  As  a  result,  Oregon  has  had  to  focus  on 
a  few  strategic—and  comparatively  minor—expansions  of  capacity  on  Interstate  5 
in  recent  years.  While  these  investments  do  add  capacity  to  the  Interstate  in  key 
locations,  they  have  not  kept  up  with  recent  increases  in  traffic,  much  less  ad-
dressed the rapidly growing demand we forecast for the future. The result has been, 
and will continue to be, increased congestion that slows the movement of people and 
freight. 

Even with the construction of highway projects that expand capacity on the Inter-
state  and  other  routes,  investing  in  highways  alone  won’t  fully  address  these  prob-
lems  because  no  single  transportation  mode  can  serve  all  the  needs  and  handle  all 
the demand. Addressing congestion and the costs it imposes on the economy and the 
quality of life for residents of the Northwest will require investing in transportation 
infrastructure  across  a  variety  of  modes.  We  must  look  for  alternative  means  of 
moving people and goods that take vehicles off our Interstate system. This helps en-
sure  that  when  highway  investments  are  made  they  function  for  many  years.  For 
example,  we  need  to  invest  in  expanding  capacity  on  the  freight  rail  system  to  re-
duce  the  growth  rate  of  truck  traffic  on  our  highways,  particularly  given  the  explo-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

sive  growth  in  freight  predicted  in  the  next  few  decades.  And  we  should  invest  in 
passenger rail to move a portion of travel off the highway and onto trains. 
Reaching the Corridor’s Full Potential 

We  believe  that  passenger  rail  serves  an  important  role  in  meeting  some  of  the 
demand  for  travel  on  the  Interstate  5  corridor  and  thus  could  play  an  increasingly 
important  role  in  the  regional  transportation  system  and  our  efforts  to  reduce  con-
gestion. As fast as ridership on the Northwest Corridor has grown, there is potential 
for much greater growth if we make the investments needed to improve service. 

The  elements  that  make  passenger  train  service  desirable  to  citizens  are  in-
creased  reliability,  reduction  in  travel  time  and  enhanced  frequency.  The  largest 
barrier  to  higher  ridership  in  the  Northwest  is  that  taking  the  train  is  often  not 
convenient  to  passengers  because  of  infrequent  service  and  poor  on-time  perform-
ance.  The  current  Cascades  service  in  Oregon  offers  just  two  daily  trains  between 
Eugene and Portland and thus provides few options for travel. 

What’s  more,  calling  this  a  high-speed  rail  corridor  is  something  of  a  misnomer: 
the Amtrak trains frequently encounter conflicts with freight trains on the heavily- 
congested  freight  lines  they  use,  which  causes  serious  problems  with  on-time  per-
formance.  For  Fiscal  Year  2007  to  date,  the  Cascades  on-time  performance  is  only 
51.7  percent,  compared  to  a  target  of  80  percent.  These  factors  significantly  limit 
the convenience of traveling by train: if there isn’t a train to get you where you need 
to  be  at  the  time  you  need  to  be  there,  and  you  can’t  be  sure  it  will  get  you  there 
on  schedule  even  if  there  is  a  train,  you  won’t  be  very  likely  to  ride.  Despite  these 
issues  that  reduce  the  convenience  of  train  travel,  ridership  has  continued  to  grow 
on the corridor. 

Oregon  and  Washington  would  like  to  address  the  problem  of  infrequent  service 
by  significantly  increasing  the  number  of  trains  operating  on  the  corridor.  The  two 
states  have  established  20-year  plans  for  the  Cascades  service  that  will  accommo-
date  the  growth  expected  in  the  region.  Oregon’s  plans  call  for  six  roundtrips  be-
tween  Eugene  and  Portland.  Washington  State’s  plans  call  for  13  roundtrips  be-
tween  Portland  and  Seattle,  and  four  roundtrips  between  Seattle  and  Vancouver, 
British  Columbia.  This  would  offer  travelers  enough  options  that  they  would  be 
much more likely to find a train that fits their travel schedule. 

Unfortunately,  there  are  a  number  of  significant  barriers  to  be  addressed  before 
we  could  upgrade  service  to  this  level.  Beyond  the  additional  cost  of  operating  the 
trains, Oregon would have to purchase additional trains to put into service because 
the current train sets that Oregon uses are owned by Washington and Amtrak and 
are  at  maximum  capacity.  This  means  that  if  either  Washington  or  Oregon  adds 
service, Oregon will need to acquire train equipment. 

In addition, passenger rail service is constrained by the capacity of the freight rail 
lines  on  which  the  trains  run.  The  track  on  which  Amtrak  operates  is  owned  by 
Union Pacific Railroad, and it is highly congested. The State of Oregon has already 
invested over $30 million to upgrade the freight rail infrastructure to accommodate 
the  first  two  trains.  Before  Union  Pacific  would  allow  Oregon  to  run  more  trains, 
it  would  require  significant  investments  in  expanded  capacity  to  ensure  that  pas-
senger trains did not cause delays for its freight trains. 
The Need for Federal Partnership 

Because  Oregon  has  no  dedicated  source  of  funding  for  rail  infrastructure  up-
grades, making these improvements would be very difficult without a strong Federal 
partnership. That’s why ODOT is excited about the Passenger Rail Investment and 
Improvement  Act.  We  believe  this  legislation  is  a  very  strong  bill  that  will  result 
in significant improvements to passenger rail service at the national level and help 
us make the investments the Northwest needs to reach our rail corridor’s full poten-
tial. 

Of  particular  interest  to  us  is  the  intercity  passenger  rail  Federal  capital  match-
ing grant program, which would provide states essential funding to invest in equip-
ment,  track,  and  facilities  in  order  to  improve  intercity  passenger  rail  service.  Or-
egon is very supportive of the establishment of this program. ODOT and the Wash-
ington  Department  of  Transportation  could  receive  funds  under  this  program  to 
make  the  necessary  rail  infrastructure  upgrades  to  facilitate  more  frequent  pas-
senger rail service with better on-time performance. We appreciate that the program 
is structured to reward states that have already made investments in passenger rail 
by  providing  a  credit  toward  that  matching  share  of  the  grants.  Under  this  provi-
sion, Oregon would receive credit for millions of dollars we have invested in rail in-
frastructure, which would help us stretch our limited state resources further. 

In  addition  to  the  grant  program  for  states  to  improve  passenger  rail  service, 
there are a number of other aspects of the bill that ODOT supports, such as a proc-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

ess  for  host  railroads  and  Amtrak  to  address  poor  on-time  performance,  which  is 
sorely  needed.  With  stable  capital  and  operating  funding,  Amtrak  can  have  a  more 
robust  operating  partnership,  for  example  keeping  equipment  in  good  repair  and 
partnering with states to acquire additional equipment. 

While some have proposed dismantling Amtrak and having states pick up the re-
sponsibility  for  operating  intercity  passenger  rail,  ODOT  believes  that  Amtrak 
should  remain  as  a  national  passenger  rail  operating  company.  Oregon  has  neither 
the ability nor the desire to take up this responsibility. We have had a very success-
ful partnership with Amtrak that builds on Amtrak’s strengths, particularly its abil-
ity  to  successfully  operate  passenger  rail  service,  as  well  as  its  statutory  access  to 
the  freight  railroad  system,  brand,  reservation  system,  and  other  assets.  If  Amtrak 
were dismantled, creating a separate operating company for the Northwest Corridor 
would be extremely problematic and difficult, and I doubt the region would have the 
appetite  or  resources  to  do  this.  Consequently,  ODOT  appreciates  that  this  legisla-
tion  does  not  undermine  Amtrak’s  status  as  the  primary  national  operator  of  pas-
senger rail service while encouraging states to partner with Amtrak. 

The legislation also follows the successful Northwest model by encouraging states 
to  pay  for  Amtrak  service.  ODOT  appreciates  the  cost-allocation  methodology  in-
cluded  in  the  legislation,  which  is  intended  to  develop  and  implement  a  standard-
ized method for allocating the costs of providing service between states and Amtrak 
to  ensure  equal  treatment.  We  believe  it  is  important  that  the  contributions  ex-
pected from states be equitable to ensure that all are paying their fair share. 
Conclusion 

In  conclusion,  ODOT  supports  the  Passenger  Rail  Investment  and  Improvement 
Act.  We  appreciate  the  legislation’s  recognition  of  the  importance  of  passenger  rail 
to the Nation’s transportation system, and we support the creation of a Federal cap-
ital matching grant program that will make targeted investments in improving pas-
senger  rail  service.  As  our  Nation’s  highways  become  increasingly  congested,  pas-
senger  rail  holds  the  potential  for  meeting  an  increasing  share  of  the  demand  for 
travel. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much, Ms. Taylor. We like 
that  endorsement,  and  that’s  why  we  are  so  pleased  that  Senator 
Smith  has  been  working  as  one  of  the  primary  cosponsors  of  this 
legislation, and we look forward to continuing that. 

And  when  I  hear  the  things  that  you  talk  about,  it’s  the  same 
things that we talk about in New Jersey. The freight mix is a very 
tough thing, because the—it takes a lot more maintenance to keep 
the  trackage  and  the  other  facilities  up  to  date.  So,  we  thank  you 
very much. 

And  now,  Mr.  Kummant.  Mr.  Kummant  is  Amtrak’s  President 
and  CEO,  and  we  look  forward  to  hearing  your  testimony,  Mr. 
Kummant. 

STATEMENT OF ALEX KUMMANT, 

PRESIDENT/CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER, AMTRAK 

Mr.  KUMMANT.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you,  Ranking 

Member Smith. 

Again,  I’m  Alex  Kummant.  I’ve  been  Amtrak’s  President  since 
September  of  last  year.  I  appreciate  being  here  with  you  today  as 
we  consider  S.  294.  It  is  against  the  backdrop  of  this  legislation 
that  I  believe  we’re  truly  at  a  crossroads,  in  terms  of  the  future  of 
passenger rail service in this country. I look forward to this discus-
sion. 

Again,  before  I  begin,  though,  I  would  like  to  offer  my  apprecia-
tion  to  the  Committee,  and  particularly  to  Senators  Lautenberg 
and  Lott,  for  your  sustained  and  persistent  efforts.  This  is  clearly 
important to drive home. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

Let me speak briefly to you about our vision for a national inter-
city  passenger  rail  system  for  the  21st  century,  and  why  the  pas-
sage of S. 294 is integral to its future. 

In short, our vision for Amtrak is one of growth, of product excel-
lence,  and  of  sound  management.  Some  of  the  approaches  we’re 
taking  to  advance  the  key  elements  of  this  vision  include  the  fol-
lowing: 

Positioning Amtrak to support the growing demand for State cor-
ridor passenger rail services. I’ve said it in other venues, but clear-
ly  the  States  are  the  future,  State  corridors  are  very  much  the  fu-
ture. And anything we look at, growth projections are driven by the 
States,  and  State  demands,  as  we,  here,  have  heard,  really,  from 
both State representatives here. 

Also,  in  that  case,  we  need  to  align  our  organization—and  we’re 
in  the  process  of  doing  that—with  the  needs  of  our  State  partners 
as  they  take  a  broader  and  broader  role  here  in  the  future  of  Am-
trak. 

We  also  need  to  ensure  that  our  service  quality  continues  to  im-

prove, with a strong customer focus. 

And the whole underlying piece of running this operation is driv-
ing  continuous  improvement,  both  by  improving  the  state  of  good 
repair  of  our  physical  assets  and  by  continuing  to  drive  efficiency 
across the entire operation. 

These objectives—growth, product excellence, and sound manage-

ment—are attainable. And let me tell you why I believe that. 

First,  and  most  importantly,  passenger  rail  service  is  becoming 
more  and  more  relevant  in  more  and  more  areas  of  the  country 
every day. We’ve heard a lot on—all around this room, about high-
way  and  airport  congestion,  which  continues  to  grow  apace.  Com-
munities  and  regions  are  looking  for  transportation  alternatives 
across  all  modes.  And  passenger  rail  often  serves  as  a  catalyst  for 
economic  development,  frequently  playing  a  significant  role  in  the 
rejuvenation of the urban centers of small and mid-sized cities. 

Second, history clearly can be a guide to the future. Amtrak’s ex-
isting corridor trains are carrying record numbers of passengers. In 
the last year, we’ve seen the expansion of corridor services in many 
parts  of  the  country.  There  are  many  reasons  for  this,  including 
higher  fuel  prices  and  other  societal  trends.  Moreover,  many  of 
these  services  connect  communities  that,  themselves,  are  growing 
rapidly. 

The growth of corridor service is one response to addressing soci-

ety’s changing transportation needs. Let me cite a few examples: 

In California, on the Capitol Corridor between Oakland and Sac-
ramento, we now operate 16 daily roundtrip trains. That’s 32 train 
movements  a  day,  or  more  than  one  passenger  train  every  hour.  I 
also  believe  that  that  volume  has  dramatically  expanded  over  that 
period of time. 

Last  October,  in  Illinois,  in  partnership  with  the  State,  we  more 
than  doubled  our  service  on  three  different  corridors  out  of  Chi-
cago. 

In  Pennsylvania,  as  we  heard,  we  added  frequencies  and  dra-
matically  reduced  travel  times  on  the  Keystone  Corridor  between 
Harrisburg and Philadelphia. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

And  we  just  heard  a  great  discussion  of  the  Cascades  service, 

and we certainly hope to be expanding that in the future. 

In  addition  to  what  was  done  last  year,  we  anticipate  frequency 
additions  on  existing  corridors  in  Maine,  Wisconsin,  perhaps  even 
Michigan and North Carolina. 

The  third  reason  why  I’m  optimistic  is  because  of  what  is  occur-
ring  here  today.  Congress  is  moving  quickly  on  a  reauthorization 
bill. You have taken a very comprehensive approach to this legisla-
tion. I thank you for that. 

Before I close, I’d like to leave you with a couple of other positive 
messages.  Total  systemwide  ridership  is  up  slightly,  and  revenue 
is up 10 percent, relative to last year. Because of improvements to 
the Acela product, and significant investment in the Northeast Cor-
ridor  infrastructure,  Acela  on-time  performance  is  averaging  90 
percent, and ridership was up by double digits in the first quarter. 
In  fact,  it  was  up  19  percent,  year  over  year,  in  December,  to  the 
point of, ‘‘If you build it, they will come.’’ 

Long-distance travel continues to hold, and is actually up slight-
ly. Ridership is up on corridor services systemwide about 5 percent, 
and in some cases there is double-digit growth. Our safety numbers 
are  very  good,  and  injuries  have  been  trending  down,  with  report-
able  injuries  down  42  percent,  year  over  year.  From  Fiscal  Year 
2004  to  2007,  a  significant  amount  of  investment  in  the  Northeast 
Corridor—track,  switches,  signals,  and  catenary—has  gone  a  long 
way toward rebuilding the Northeast Corridor, and we’re now mov-
ing on to some larger projects, such as bridge replacement. 

We’ve  reduced  our  outstanding  debt  by  nearly  $500  million  over 
the last 4 years. In other words, most of the key indicators that the 
Amtrak board and I watch closely are headed in the right direction. 
So, you can see why I’m very hopeful about where Amtrak is head-
ed. 

We  look  forward  to  working  with  you  as  we  move  forward  on  S. 
294 in what I believe will be a very exciting period with passenger 
rail development in this country. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Kummant follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ALEX KUMMANT, 

PRESIDENT/CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER, AMTRAK 

Good  morning,  I  am  Alex  Kummant,  and  I  have  been  Amtrak’s  President  and 
Chief  Executive  Officer  since  September  2006.  I  appreciate  being  here  with  you 
today  as  you  consider  S.  294,  the  Passenger  Rail  Investment  and  Improvement  Act 
of  2007.  It  is  against  the  backdrop  of  this  legislation  that  I  believe  we  are  truly  at 
a crossroads in terms of the future for passenger rail service in this country. I look 
forward to our discussion and thank you for the opportunity to testify. 

Before  I  begin,  I  would  like  to  offer  my  appreciation  to  this  Committee,  but  par-
ticularly  Senator  Lautenberg  and  Senator  Lott  for  your  tireless  efforts  to  advance 
this  legislation  and  for  your  leadership  on  Amtrak  and  passenger  rail  issues.  Let 
me  speak  to  you  briefly  about  my  vision  for  a  national  intercity  passenger  rail  sys-
tem  for  the  21st  century  and  why  the  passage  of  S.  294  is  so  integral  to  its  future. 
In short, my vision for Amtrak is one of growth, of product excellence, and sound 
management.  Some  of  the  approaches  we  are  taking  to  advance  the  key  elements 
of this vision include: 

• Positioning Amtrak to support demand growth for state corridor service. 
• Aligning our organization to meet the needs of state partners as their role con-
• Ensuring that our service quality continues to improve. 

tinues to expand. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

• Driving  continuous  improvement  both  by  improving  the  state  of  good  repair  of 

our physical assets and by continuing to reduce our operating costs. 

25 

These  objectives—growth,  product  excellence,  sound  management—are  attainable 

and let me tell you why I believe that. 

First  and  most  important,  passenger  rail  service  is  becoming  more  and  more  rel-

evant in more and more parts of the country each day: 

• Highway and airport congestion continues to grow apace. 
• Communities and regions are looking for transportation alternatives. 
• Passenger rail serves as a catalyst for economic development. 
Second, history can be a guide to the future—Amtrak’s existing corridor trains are 
carrying record numbers of passengers. In the last year we have seen the expansion 
of  corridor  services  in  many  parts  of  the  country.  There  are  many  reasons  for  this 
including higher fuel prices and other societal trends. Moreover, many of these serv-
ices  connect  communities  that  are  growing  rapidly.  The  growth  of  corridor  service 
is  one  response  to  addressing  society’s  changing  transportation  needs.  Let  me  cite 
a few examples: 

• In  California,  on  the  Capitol  Corridor  between  Oakland  and  Sacramento,  we 
now  operate  16  daily  round  trip  trains;  that’s  32  train  movements  a  day,  or 
more than one passenger train every hour. 

• Last  October  in  Illinois,  in  partnership  with  the  state,  we  more  than  doubled 

our service on three different corridors out of Chicago. 

• In  Pennsylvania,  we  added  frequencies  and  dramatically  reduced  travel  times 

on the Keystone Corridor between Harrisburg and Philadelphia. 

• There  was  also  an  additional  frequency  added  on  the  very  successful  Cascades 
service in the Pacific Northwest, and we hope to add another frequency on that 
corridor shortly. 

• In  addition  to  what  was  done  last  year,  we  anticipate  frequency  additions  on 
existing  corridors  in  Maine,  Wisconsin  and  perhaps  even  Michigan  and  North 
Carolina in the near future. 

The third reason why I am optimistic is because of what is occurring today. Con-
gress is moving quickly on a reauthorization bill. You have taken a very comprehen-
sive approach through this legislation and I commend you for that. 

• The  creation  of  a  Federal  capital  matching  program  for  states  as  envisioned  in 
S. 294, the Lautenberg/Lott bill, is absolutely essential for the future of corridor 
development.  The  Administration  in  its  FY08  budget  request  to  Congress  also 
has indicated its support for the establishment of such a matching program. 

• In addition to the emphasis on corridor development, S. 294 includes numerous 
operational improvement requirements that align with the progress already un-
derway  at  Amtrak,  first  started  in  our  2005  Strategic  Reform  Initiatives,  and 
that will encourage us to continue to make even more improvements operation-
ally. 

• The  bill  authorizes  full  funding  to  bring  the  Northeast  Corridor  to  a  state-of- 

good repair. 

• S.  294  directs  Amtrak  to  work  with  states  to  develop  a  uniform  cost  allocation 
methodology for our state-supported services. As more and more states look into 
starting  corridor  service,  it  will  be  increasingly  important  for  the  states  and 
Amtrak  to  work  cooperatively  to  ensure  that  all  states  are  on  the  same  footing 
with regard to costs, both capital and operating, for services. 

• Similarly, the bill directs Amtrak and the Northeast Corridor states to work to-
gether to forge agreement on the costing methodology for access for commuters 
and ongoing capital projects. In fact, Amtrak is already reaching out to the NEC 
states  and  recently  we  invited  the  NEC  Governors  to  attend  a  March  23  meet-
ing of a new NEC Infrastructure Advisory Committee. 

• Under  the  legislation,  FRA  and  Amtrak  are  to  develop  new  system-wide  per-

formance metrics and standards on all of its long-distance services. 

• With  regard  to  security,  S.  294  authorizes  additional  funds  for  both  passenger 
and  freight  rail  security.  As  Amtrak  coordinates  and  integrates  security  en-
hancements  into  capital  investments  and  the  protection  of  critical  assets,  addi-
tional  Federal  funding  for  these  and  other  security  measures  will  assist  us  in 
our efforts to better protect our passengers and secure our assets. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

The  bill  addresses  a  host  of  other  issues  that  are  important  to  Amtrak  and  its 
many  stakeholders.  It  is  also  encouraging  that  there  is  such  strong  bipartisan  sup-
port  for  this  legislation  and  that  so  many  of  the  states  have  taken  such  a  strong 
interest in S. 294. 

Congressional  passage  of  the  reauthorization  bill  will  provide  the  foundation  for 
future  growth  in  passenger  rail  in  the  country.  To  add  service  on  new  corridors  is 
going to take capital funding—I cannot stress enough the importance of establishing 
a  capital  matching  program  for  corridor  development.  We  also  need  to  continue  to 
seek  avenues  to  bring  private  capital  into  the  mix  of  funding  to  solve  these  chal-
lenges. 

There’s  no  doubt  that  our  partners,  America’s  freight  railroads,  need  new  capac-
ity.  We  would  be  doing  a  disservice  to  our  customers  and  all  of  you,  if  we  tried  to 
start new trains without building new capacity, particularly in our urban areas. No 
place is this more evident than in Chicago, where the city, the State of Illinois, and 
the  Federal  Government  have  partnered  with  the  railroads  to  aggressively  pursue 
funding for the CREATE project. 

Finally, we will also need an equipment strategy. Amtrak’s fleet is both aging and 
stretched  to  the  limit.  The  lack  of  additional  available  equipment  is  going  to  have 
to be dealt with in order to see Amtrak grow. Again, this will take capital. 

Obviously,  the  focus  of  today’s  hearing  is  S.  294.  But  because  there  are  so  many 
positive  developments  underway  at  Amtrak,  what  I’ve  tried  to  do  is  provide  you 
with  a  quick  broad  brush  picture  of  the  last  12  months  at  Amtrak  and  how  we  see 
the  next  12  to  18  months  shaping  up.  I  also  hope  I’ve  laid  out  for  you  my  vision 
of  Amtrak’s  future.  There  are  many  other  initiatives  going  on  to  improve  the  prod-
uct  which  include  a  better  way  to  provide  food  service  on  our  long-distance  trains 
and e-ticketing, and I would be happy to go into more detail of those initiatives dur-
ing the Q & A period. 

to last year. 

In conclusion, let me leave you with a couple of positive messages: 
• Total system-wide ridership is up slightly and revenue is up 10 percent relative 
• Because of improvements to the Acela product and significant investment in the 
NEC infrastructure, Acela on-time performance is averaging 90 percent and rid-
ership was up by double digits in the first quarter. 

cases there is double digit growth. 

we finished January of this year at 1.9. 

• Long-distance travel is up slightly. 
• Ridership  is  up  on  corridor  services,  system  wide,  about  5  percent  and  in  some 
• Our  safety  numbers  are  very  good  and  injuries  have  been  trending  down  and 
• From FY 2004–2007, a significant amount of investment in NEC track, switch-
es,  signals  and  catenary  has  gone  a  long  way  toward  rebuilding  the  Northeast 
Corridor  and  we  are  now  moving  on  to  some  of  the  larger  projects  such  as 
bridge replacement. 
• We’ve  reduced  our  outstanding  debt  by  nearly  $500  million  over  the  last  4 
• In  other  words,  most  of  the  key  indicators  that  the  Amtrak  Board  and  I  watch 

years. 

closely are headed in the right direction. 

You  can  see  why  I  am  very  hopeful  about  where  Amtrak  is  headed.  We  look  for-
ward  to  working  with  you  as  you  move  forward  on  S.  294  and  what  I  believe  will 
lead to a very exciting period of passenger rail development in this country. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks very much, Mr. Kummant. 
Now  for  Mr.  Busalacchi,  Secretary  of  the  Wisconsin  Department 
of Transportation, also serving as Chair of the States for Passenger 
Rail Coalition. We thank you, Mr. Busalacchi, for being here today. 
STATEMENT  OF  HON.  FRANK  J.  BUSALACCHI,  SECRETARY, 
WISCONSIN  DEPARTMENT  OF  TRANSPORTATION;  CHAIR, 
STATES FOR PASSENGER RAIL COALITION 
Mr.  BUSALACCHI.  Chairman  Lautenberg,  distinguished  Senators, 
my  name  is  Frank  Busalacchi.  I’m  Secretary  of  the  Wisconsin  De-
partment  of  Transportation,  and  Chair  of  the  States  for  Passenger 
Rail Coalition. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

I  am  also  a  member  of  the  National  Surface  Transportation  Pol-
icy  and  Revenue  Study  Commission.  The  National  Commission  is 
working to construct the new 50-year vision for the Nation’s trans-
portation  system.  We’re  in  the  midst  of  our  deliberations,  and  my 
comments  do  not  represent  the  views  of  the  National  Commission. 
Every commissioner is working to keep an open mind on all issues. 
I appreciate this opportunity to share my comments on passenger 
rail  issues  and  S.  294.  This  bill  is  an  important  first  step  in  cre-
ating  a  passenger  rail  program  to  meet  the  mobility  needs  of  the 
public. 

Let  me  begin  by  focusing  on  Wisconsin.  As  Secretary  of  Wis-
consin  DOT,  I  know  firsthand  that  the  American  public  is  clam-
oring  for  expansion  of  passenger  rail  services.  Our  State  provides 
financial  support  to  Amtrak’s  Hiawatha  service,  which  operates  in 
the busy Milwaukee-to-Chicago corridor. Since 1989, we have com-
mitted almost $100 million in capital and operating support for ex-
isting  and  future  Amtrak  service  in  Wisconsin.  This  includes  an-
nual operating support, new or renovated stations, rail corridor ac-
quisition, crossing improvements, and planning studies. 

The public has responded. Last year, Amtrak’s Hiawatha service 
carried  588,000  passengers,  a  48-percent  increase  in  just  5  years. 
And the public wants more. With Amtrak providing excellent serv-
ice  from  Chicago  to  Milwaukee,  the  demand  is  strong  to  expand 
service another 90 miles to Madison. Madison is ripe for passenger 
rail  service.  It’s  the  state  capital,  home  to  the  University  of  Wis-
consin,  and  boasts  a  metro  population  of  450,000  that  is  highly 
supportive of energy-efficient alternative transportation options. 

Wisconsin  Governor  Jim  Doyle  has  proposed  a  total  of  $80  mil-
lion in state bonding authority as a 20-percent match to our future 
Federal  funds  for  the  Madison  extension.  Unfortunately,  no  pro-
gram exists to provide Federal funding, and Wisconsin simply can-
not undertake these projects on its own. 

Wisconsin  is  not  alone  in  this  predicament.  The  States  for  Pas-
senger  Rail  Coalition  represents  28  States  that  support  intercity 
rail services around the country. Many States share Wisconsin’s ex-
perience and frustration regarding passenger rail service. Virtually 
all  of  Amtrak’s  ridership  gains  over  the  past  several  years  have 
come  through  state-sponsored  services.  From  Washington  to  Flor-
ida,  from  New  York  to  California,  and  everywhere  in  between, 
States  have  committed  hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  for  short- 
term  incremental  improvements  that  have  fueled  the  growth  of 
Amtrak  ridership.  States  have  completed  environmental  analyses, 
put  plans  on  the  shelf,  and  have  passengers  ready  to  get  onboard 
the  trains.  What’s  missing  is  a  strong  Federal  partner  to  make  it 
happen.  That’s  why  I’m  grateful  to  Senator  Lautenberg  for  intro-
ducing  S.  294,  the  Passenger  Rail  Investment  and  Improvement 
Act  of  2007.  The  legislation  will  stabilize  Amtrak  with  necessary 
operating  funds  for  the  next  6  years.  The  bill  provides  $6.3  billion 
for  Amtrak  to  implement  capital  projects,  including  the  Northeast 
Corridor.  It  also  lays  the  basic  framework  for  Amtrak  to  work  in 
partnership  with  the  states  on  an  80/20  Federal/state  share  pro-
gram  to  implement  regional  capital  projects.  Both  the  Wisconsin 
DOT and the States for Passenger Rail Coalition endorse S. 294 as 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

an  initial  step  to  bring  passenger  rail  service  to  the  public  that  is 
demanding mobility options. 

While S. 294 is a good start, it does not contain the funding nec-
essary to meet states’ needs around the country. Of the $6.3 billion 
in capital funds, the state-sponsored projects are eligible to receive 
only $1.4 billion. Under provisions of the bill, the most available to 
fund a single project in a given year is about $400 million. Wiscon-
sin’s Milwaukee-to-Madison Project will require $400 million all by 
itself.  A  recent  AASHTO  report  identified  $17  billion  in  needs  in 
the near term for passenger rail capital projects across the Nation, 
including  $10.4  billion  for  state-sponsored  projects.  Therefore,  as 
the  Senate  moves  ahead  on  S.  294,  I  respectfully  ask  this  com-
mittee  to  continue  its  efforts  to  provide  a  dedicated  passenger  rail 
capital program to fund the Nation’s rail needs. 

The Federal Government provides the support for highways. It is 
needed  for  passenger  rail,  as  well.  S.  294  includes  provisions  that 
could  make  it  happen:  stabilization  of  Amtrak,  support  for  the 
Northeast  Corridor,  and  the  beginnings  of  an  80/20  capital  invest-
ment program for State initiatives. 

The  States  for  Passenger  Rail  Coalition  is  willing  to  work  with 
the  Senate  and  the  House  to  help  craft  legislation  that  will  fully 
support the needs of our Nation. 

In  conclusion,  I  want  to,  again,  thank  Chairman  Lautenberg,  S. 
294  cosponsors,  for  recognizing  what  we,  in  the  States,  have  seen 
firsthand,  the  demand  for  fast,  reliable  train  service.  Working  to-
gether, the states and the Federal Government can provide the mo-
bility options that passenger rail can bring to our citizens. 

Thank you for the opportunity to speak to you today. I appreciate 

your attention and look forward to answering your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Busalacchi follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK J. BUSALACCHI, SECRETARY, WISCONSIN 

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION; CHAIR, STATES FOR PASSENGER RAIL COALITION 
Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith  and  distinguished  Senators,  my 
name  is  Frank  Busalacchi.  I  am  Secretary  of  the  Wisconsin  Department  of  Trans-
portation and Chair of the States for Passenger Rail Coalition. 

I  am  also  a  member  of  the  National  Surface  Transportation  Policy  and  Revenue 
Study Commission. The National Commission is working to construct a new 50-year 
vision  for  the  Nation’s  transportation  system.  We  are  in  the  midst  of  our  delibera-
tions  and  my  comments  do  not  represent  the  views  of  the  National  Commission. 
Every Commissioner is working to keep an open mind on all issues. 

I appreciate this opportunity to share my comments on passenger rail issues and 
Senate Bill 294. This bill is an important first step in creating a passenger rail pro-
gram to meet the mobility needs of the public. 
Wisconsin Passenger Rail Initiatives 

Let  me  begin  by  focusing  on  Wisconsin.  As  Secretary  of  Wisconsin  DOT,  I  know 
firsthand that the American public is clamoring for expansion of passenger rail serv-
ices. 

Our  state  provides  financial  support  to  Amtrak’s  Hiawatha  Service,  which  oper-
ates in the busy Milwaukee to Chicago corridor. Since 1989, we have committed al-
most  $100  million  in  capital  and  operating  support  for  existing  and  future  Amtrak 
service in Wisconsin. This includes annual operating support, new or renovated sta-
tions, rail corridor acquisition, crossing improvements, and planning studies. 

• Wisconsin  has  worked  in  partnership  with  the  State  of  Illinois  to  provide  an-
nual  operating  support  for  Amtrak’s  Hiawatha  Service.  Our  state  provided  ap-
proximately $6.5 million last year. Wisconsin Governor Jim Doyle has proposed 
another  $500,000  in  his  2007–09  biennial  budget  to  add  a  car  to  each  train, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

since  many  of  the  trains  are  so  popular  they  now  have  standing-room  only  for 
a 90-minute trip. 

• Our  state  has  also  undertaken  three  major  station  development  projects  for 
Hiawatha  Service  customers.  In  2005,  we  opened  a  new  passenger  rail  station 
at  Milwaukee’s  General  Mitchell  International  Airport.  In  2006,  the  village  of 
Sturtevant replaced a 100-year-old station with a brand new facility. Later this 
year,  we  will  finish  a  $16  million  renovation  of  the  downtown  Milwaukee  sta-
tion.  This  public-private  partnership  will  provide  a  new  multimodal  facility  for 
Amtrak  trains  and  Greyhound  buses,  along  with  commercial  development  op-
portunities. 

• Wisconsin has also invested funds to look to the future. Our state has conducted 
an environmental assessment of a project to expand service from Milwaukee to 
Madison and has received a Federal Finding of No Significant Impact (FONSI). 
We  have  invested  funds  to  purchase  and  preserve  a  portion  of  the  rail  corridor 
for this future extension. 

The  public  has  responded  to  all  of  these  investments.  Last  year,  Amtrak’s  Hia-

watha Service carried 588,000 passengers—a 48 percent increase in just 5 years. 

Now,  the  public  wants  more.  With  Amtrak  providing  excellent  service  from  Chi-
cago to Milwaukee and with engineering plans on the shelf and ready to go, the de-
mand is strong to expand service another 90 miles to Madison. 

Madison is ripe for passenger rail service. It is the state capital, home to the Uni-
versity of Wisconsin, and it boasts a metro population of 450,000 that is highly sup-
portive of alternative transportation options. 

Wisconsin is also looking to this service as a way to provide energy efficient trans-
portation that can help reduce our Nation’s dependency on foreign oil. Intercity pas-
senger  rail  uses  17  to  18  percent  less  energy  per  passenger  mile  than  commercial 
air  travel  or  personal  auto  travel,  according  to  the  Oak  Ridge  National  Laboratory. 
Wisconsin  has  already  committed  $48  million  in  bonding  authority  toward  this 
service.  Governor  Doyle  has  proposed  increasing  this  to  a  total  of  $80  million  in 
state  bonding  authority  as  a  20  percent  match  toward  future  Federal  funds  for  the 
Madison  extension.  Unfortunately,  no  program  exists  to  provide  Federal  funding, 
and Wisconsin simply cannot undertake these projects on its own. 
National Passenger Rail Initiatives 

Wisconsin  is  not  alone  in  this  predicament.  The  States  for  Passenger  Rail  Coali-
tion  represents  28  states  that  support  intercity  rail  service  around  the  country. 
Many  states  share  Wisconsin’s  experience  and  frustration  regarding  passenger  rail 
service. 

Virtually  all  of  Amtrak’s  ridership  gains  over  the  past  several  years  have  come 

through state-sponsored services. 

• Fourteen states provide annual operating support for Amtrak intercity corridor 

services. 

• These  state-supported  services  account  for  35  percent  of  Amtrak’s  daily  rider-

ship and about half of all passenger trains in the system. 

• State-supported  services  such  as  Pennsylvania’s  Keystone  Service,  Illinois’  Chi-
cago  to  St.  Louis  trains,  the  Downeaster  in  Maine,  and  Oklahoma’s  Heartland 
Flyer  have  joined  Wisconsin’s  Hiawatha  Service  in  realizing  double-digit  per-
centage increases in ridership. 

• A GAO report 1 from this past November notes that total ridership on the state- 
supported  corridor  routes  increased  by  18  percent  from  2002  through  2005, 
while ridership growth on other parts of the system remained relatively flat. 

From Washington to Florida, from New York to California and everywhere in be-
tween,  states  have  committed  hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  for  short-term,  incre-
mental improvements that have fueled the growth in Amtrak ridership. States have 
completed  environmental  analyses,  put  plans  on  the  shelf,  and  have  passengers 
ready  to  board  the  trains.  Around  the  Nation,  35  states  have  developed  intercity 
passenger rail plans. 
The Support for S. 294 

What’s  missing  is  a  strong  Federal  partner  to  make  it  happen.  That’s  why  I  am 
grateful  to  Senator  Lautenberg  for  introducing  S.  294,  the  Passenger  Rail  Invest-
ment and Improvement Act of 2007. 

1 U.S. Government Accountability Office. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

This legislation will stabilize Amtrak with necessary operating funds for the next 
6  years.  The  bill  provides  $6.3  billion  for  Amtrak  to  implement  capital  projects,  in-
cluding  those  on  the  Northeast  Corridor.  It  also  lays  the  basic  framework  for  Am-
trak  to  work  in  partnership  with  the  states  on  an  80/20  Federal-state  share  to  im-
plement regional capital projects. 

Both  the  Wisconsin  DOT  and  the  States  for  Passenger  Rail  Coalition  endorse  S. 
294 as an initial step to bring fast, reliable and energy-efficient passenger rail serv-
ice to a public that is demanding mobility options. 
The Needs Beyond S. 294 

While  S.  294  is  a  good  start,  it  does  not  contain  the  funding  necessary  to  meet 
states’  needs  around  the  country.  Of  the  $6.3  billion  in  capital  funds,  state-spon-
sored  projects  are  eligible  to  receive  only  $1.4  billion.  Under  provisions  of  the  bill, 
the  most  available  to  fund  a  single  project  in  a  given  year  is  about  $400  million. 
Wisconsin’s Milwaukee to Madison project will require $400 million alone. 

A recent AASHTO 2 report identified $17 billion of needs in the near term for rail 
capital  projects  across  the  Nation,  including  $10.4  billion  of  needs  for  state-based 
corridors. 

• In all, the AASHTO report identified nearly $60 billion in needed passenger rail 
capital  investment  over  the  next  20  years  in  the  country,  including  for  basic 
Amtrak system needs. 
• The  November  GAO  report  reiterated  that  the  state-supported  services  are  the 
most time and cost competitive for passengers, but these corridors face capacity 
constraints and long-term funding issues for capital needs. 

Therefore, as the Senate moves ahead on S. 294, I respectfully ask this committee 
to continue its efforts to provide a dedicated passenger rail capital program to fund 
the  Nation’s  rail  needs.  The  Federal  Government  provides  this  support  for  high-
ways—it  is  needed  for  passenger  rail  as  well.  S.  294  includes  provisions  that  could 
make  it  happen—stabilization  of  Amtrak,  support  for  the  Northeast  Corridor,  and 
the beginnings of an 80/20 capital investment program for state initiatives. 

The States for Passenger Rail Coalition (SPRC) is willing to work with the Senate 
and  the  House  to  help  craft  legislation  that  will  fully  support  the  needs  of  our  Na-
tion. 

• SPRC supports H.R. 1631, the Railroad Infrastructure Development and Expan-
sion  Act  for  the  21st  Century  (RIDE–21)  that  provides  $12  billion  in  tax  credit 
bonding authority for states to use on corridor projects. 
• SPRC also supported past legislation, including S. 1516, the Passenger Rail In-
vestment  and  Improvement  Act  of  2005,  the  predecessor  to  S.  294,  though  the 
$1.4  billion  in  this  bill  for  state  corridor  grants  did  not  fully  address  the  na-
tional needs. 
• SPRC members call for balance in the Federal transportation funding programs. 
Only 4 percent of Federal transportation dollars are dedicated to rail programs, 
yet  rail  provides  incredible  potential  to  carry  millions  of  passengers  on  energy- 
efficient and time-competitive services in corridors of national significance. 

Conclusion 

In  conclusion,  I  want  to  again  thank  Chairman  Lautenberg  and  the  S.  294  co- 
sponsors  for  recognizing  what  we  in  the  states  have  seen  first-hand—the  demand 
for fast, efficient train service by our citizens. Working together, the states and the 
Federal  Government  can  provide  the  mobility  options  that  intercity  rail  can  bring 
to our citizens. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  with  you  today.  I  appreciate  your  atten-

tion and look forward to answering your questions. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks very much. 
I  want  to  point  out  something  to  you.  The  references  typically 
made  to  the  Northeast  Corridor,  and  the  Northeast  Corridor  will 
absorb  so  much  of  the  funding.  And  it  is  the  busiest  part  of  the 
railroad.  But  when  you  look  here,  and  you  see  that  we  have,  actu-
ally,  four  lines  that  go  cross-country  from  the  South  to  the  North, 
the center of the country has a significant participation by Amtrak 

2 American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

in  transportation  needs.  The  West  Coast  has  it.  It’s  a  universal 
thing. 

And,  frankly,  to  raise  questions  about  how  we  let  it  get  this  far 
into  the  hole  is  hard  to  understand.  We  complain  about  air  pollu-
tion.  Well,  we  find  that,  per  passenger  on  railroad,  compared  to  in 
airplanes  or  highways,  it’s  far  less  consumption  of  BTUs.  And  so, 
we  get  something  there.  And  having—becoming  an  expert  on  sit-
ting  in  traffic  has,  frankly,  helped  encourage  my  support  of  pas-
senger  rail  service,  as  a  national  railroad,  as  a  national  system, 
Mr.  Boardman.  And  I  think  that  unless  we  see  it  that  way,  we’re 
making  a  mistake.  I  don’t  want  to  just  do  the  Northeast  Corridor. 
That’s not enough. 

But,  Mr.  Busalacchi,  what  I  see  is  that,  while  we’re  not  offering 
enough  here  to  take  care  of  all  the  problems—we  definitely  are 
not—when  you  look  at  what’s  happened  with  Germany  having 
spent something like $70 billion on their rail system, and how pre-
cious little we put into ours, when our country is so large, and the 
value  so  great,  from  having  reasonably  high-speed  service  for  pas-
sengers—we  see  it.  There  are  corridors  begging  for  solutions.  So, 
we’re going to try. 

This  bill,  perfection  is  the  enemy  of  the  good.  That’s  commonly 
said around here. And, while this bill isn’t perfect, it is darn good, 
in my view, in terms of getting us out of the terrible position we’re 
in,  where  we’re  reliant  on  a  system  that,  in  itself,  is  overloaded. 
The skies are finite. And they—you can’t find more ways to get air-
planes up there. Very often, the flight from here, that’s a 36-minute 
flight up to either New York Airport, LaGuardia or Newark Airport 
in  New  Jersey,  it’s  surrounded  by  a  half-hour  wait  before  you  get 
up  in  the  air,  and  a  15-minute  wait  when  you  get  there,  if  you’re 
lucky.  And  so,  we  can’t  continue  to  function  that  way.  It  reduces 
our standing to less than first rate, and we shouldn’t be in that po-
sition. 

Mr. Boardman, it’s good news to hear that President Bush agrees 
with  one  area  of  our  proposal,  and  that  is  his  Fiscal  Year  2008 
budget  includes  $100  million  toward  establishing  new  passenger 
rail  service.  How  would  that  be  paid  for?  Would  it  come  from  gen-
eral funds or some other source? 

Mr. BOARDMAN. That would be general funds, sir. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  General  funds.  Do  you  know  how  come  it 
is  a  $100  million  number?  What  does  a  $100  million  package  do? 
Mr.  BOARDMAN.  Well,  it’s  a  start  for  us  to  begin  to  do  what  we 
think  is  particularly  important.  It  is  a  common  thread  of  agree-
ment,  I  think,  among  all  parties,  and  even  what  we  heard  today 
here, of the importance of working with the States. It is important, 
even from the standpoint of on-time performance, that investments 
that  are  made  by  the  States,  that  are  matched  by  the  States,  that 
are a part of a private relationship with freight railroads, would be 
expected  to  net  on-time  performance  levels  of  as  much  as  80  per-
cent.  So,  the  package  really  begins  to  address  some  of  the  things 
that  both  Frank  talked  about  and  Kelly  talked  about  here  today. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Is  the  Administration  prepared  to  commit 
to a multiyear program that will increase that funding? Because we 
hear  pleas  for  service,  whether  it’s  to  Madison  and  we  have  them, 
also,  despite  our  crowding,  we  heard  Governor  Rendell  talk  about 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

what  happened  with  the  acceptance  of  that  line  from  Philadelphia 
to  Harrisburg.  So,  I  hope  this  is  not  a  1-year  approach.  Obviously, 
there’s  going  to  be  a  change  in  the  chief  engineer  in  the  next  year 
or so, but, for the remaining part of the Bush presidency, we’d like 
to know that our chief engineer there would support a continuation 
of, and an expansion of, this program. 

Mr. Kummant, I served as a CEO for a very large corporation for 
many years, and we learned one thing. You offer the good product, 
people  buy  it.  And  I  often  put  the  employees  first  in  our  company. 
And  it’s  a  company  that,  today,  employs  46,000  people,  a  company 
we  started  with  nothing,  more  than  50  years  ago,  worked  very 
hard.  And  what  was  the  key  to  our  success  was  the  quality  of  the 
service.  It  was  easier  to  get  customers  if  the  employees  were  con-
tent  on  their  job,  doing  what  they  can.  So,  our  mission  was,  ‘‘Give 
good  service.’’  And  I  would  say  to  you  that  the  improvement  we’ve 
seen  on  the  Acela  and  the  Northeast  Corridor,  that’s  improving 
customer  satisfaction.  It  still  has  some  ways  to  go.  But  I’ve  been 
on some very crowded trains these days, and it tells you something. 
And  so,  do  you  think  that  a  boost  in  performance  can  help  grow 
ticket  sales?  Because  a  ride  is  often  bumpy  and  late,  and  that’s  a 
terrible condition. I find—my handwriting gets much worse as I try 
to  do  it  on  the  train.  What  about  the  improvements  in  service? 
What do you think that might do for us? 

Mr.  KUMMANT.  I  agree  with  you.  We  have  a  number  of  different 
models. It’s difficult to estimate, but I think if you just look at the 
Acela  experience,  and  you  look  at  the  first  quarter  of  this  year, 
where  we  had—the  difficulty  we  had  with  the  brakes,  some  time 
back—we  now  have  very  clean  year-over-year  comparisons.  And, 
again, we see we’re consistently up double-digit. We’ve worked very 
hard  on  that  product.  We’re  running  it  around  90  percent  on-time 
performance,  even  while  we’ve  reduced  the  travel  time.  We  also 
have worked very hard on the onboard culture. We have done that, 
as  well,  for  example,  on  the  Capitol  Limited  between  Washington, 
D.C., and Chicago. And we do really see a response. But there’s no 
doubt  there’s  a  very  direct  correlation  between  on-time  perform-
ance,  ridership—and  certainly  the  experience  that  people  have 
brings  them  back.  Even  if  on-time  performance  is  not  as  good,  the 
experience is a very big deal. And clearly, our front-line employees 
are doing a great job on that product. 

So, we certainly believe there is considerable upside. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Busalacchi,  as  a  member  of  the  Na-
tional  Surface  Transportation  Policy  Commission  that  we  created 
in the highway bill, can you say that the Commission is taking se-
riously the role of passenger rail in the Nation’s future? 

Mr.  BUSALACCHI.  Yes,  Mr.  Chairman,  we  are.  We’ve  taken  a  lot 
of testimony around the country. We continue to do that. There are 
those  of  us—a  few  of  us  on  the  committee  that  take  intercity  pas-
senger  rail  very,  very  seriously.  And  I  can  assure  that  this  will  be 
part of the final report that we give back to Congress. 

But  I  would  like  to  say,  Senator,  that  what’s  going  to  be  critical 
here,  and  why  Europe  is  just—and  other  nations—have  moved  so 
far ahead of us, is commitment. It’s commitment on the part of the 
Federal  Government.  And  it’s  become  very  clear,  as  we’re  getting 
around the country and that we’re talking to the various areas and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

the  various  States,  that  the  commitment  is  not  there.  And  this  is 
what  we  really  need.  If  we  get  the  commitment,  the  real  commit-
ment  to  dollars,  we  can  make  this  system  work.  We’ve  all  said  it 
here  today,  that  people  are  riding  the  trains  in  record  numbers. 
And  that  will  continue  to  happen,  but  we’re  going  to  have  to  do  it 
so we do make these trains on time. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  we  do  have  to  complete  our  picture 
of  serious  intent,  because  that’s  the  only  way  it’s  going  to  happen. 
That,  unfortunately,  has  not  been  the  case  for  the  past  several 
years.  One  year,  there  was  so  little  money  that  it  was  obvious  it 
was  the  intention  of  the  Administration  to  bankrupt  Amtrak.  But 
we  fought  hard,  and  we  kept  it  breathing.  And  now  I  think  it’s 
coming alive in a very significant way. 

Senator Carper? 
Senator CARPER. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
And,  to  our  witnesses,  thanks  again  for  being  here,  and  thank 

you for your testimonies. 

I’m  going  to  telegraph  a  pitch.  I’m  going  to  ask  each  of  our  wit-
nesses—after  I’ve  directed  a  question  to  Mr.  Kummant,  I’m  going 
to ask each of our witnesses just to give us some constructive criti-
cism  for  our  bill.  Mention  a  couple  of  things  that  you  think  maybe 
we  should  change  as  we  move  it  through  the  amendment  process 
here  in  committee  and  on  to  the  floor.  If  you  could  think  about 
that, I would appreciate it. 

And,  while  you’re  thinking  about  that,  I’m  going  to  ask  Mr. 
Kummant,  if  he  will,  just  to  share  with  us  your  vision  for  pas-
senger  rail  service  in  this  country  in  the  first  part  of  this  century. 
Mr. KUMMANT. Again, as we go out and talk, as we’ve heard here 
today, it’s very difficult to leave this city and find people that don’t 
want  passenger  rail  services.  And  I  think,  as  Governor  Rendell 
said,  the  most  dramatic  growth,  if  we  look  out  10  or  20  years,  we 
will  see  dramatic  growth  in  the  State  in  the  intercity  corridors, 
anywhere  between,  again,  100-  to  500-mile  types  of  stretches.  And 
those numbers can, I think, easily double and triple. The challenge 
will  be  to  come  up  with  a  capital  funding  structure  and  an  ap-
proach  to  work  with  the  freight  railroads  on  the  existing  right-of- 
ways  in  order  to  make  that  happen.  While  I  do  think  that,  you 
know, true high-speed, meaning TGV European-style rail, certainly 
would  be  wonderful  to  do.  And  in  the  future,  there’s  no  doubt  we 
will have lanes that—someday that have trains of that nature. But 
we  can  do  an  awful  lot  with  conventional  equipment  today  that 
runs  up  to  80  to  100  miles  an  hour.  And  that  becomes  very  mean-
ingful service over those shorter stretches. 

So,  again,  I  see  State  DOTs  growing  dramatically  in  their  rail 
knowledge.  I  see,  you  know,  capital  programs  in  conjunction  with 
freight  railroads  where  there  are  very  specific  capacity  slots  avail-
able for both freight and passenger in order to minimize congestion 
problems.  And  another  piece  of  this  has  to  be  significant  expendi-
tures  on  equipment.  And  I  think  there’s  a  lot  of  room  for  every-
thing we’re looking at. For modern equipment, we desperately need 
to  modernize  our  existing  fleet.  I  think  that  alone  will  drive  a  lot 
of ridership, as well. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

So,  again,  we  see  the  States  taking  a  larger  and  larger  role, 
States  and  regions,  in  defining  specific  corridor  service.  That’s 
where the dramatic growth will be. 

Senator  CARPER.  Do  you  serve—as  the  head  of  Amtrak,  do  you 
have a working relationship with the presidents of the freight rail-
roads? Is there an association or a group that you meet with? 

Mr.  KUMMANT.  Well,  there  is  an  association,  but  I’ve  actually 
taken it as somewhat of a personal mission to go out, and, in fact, 
I just finished a cycle of meeting with four CEOs of the U.S.-based 
Class  I  railroads,  and  I’m  in  the  process  of  scheduling  meetings 
with our two Canadian partners. One of my goals is really to bring 
the  organizations  closer  together.  There’s  no  doubt  there  are  mo-
ments  when  there  have  been—perhaps  not  contentious,  but  not 
very  close  relationships.  And  I  think  we  see  that  already  moving. 
So,  I  have,  personally,  met  with  the  CEOs.  I  intend  to  continue  to 
do  that  and  really,  on  a  personal  level,  talk  through  issues.  We 
see—we  have  very  constructive  conversations  going  with  UP.  And 
we look as though we’ll be coming up with a new agreement there. 
And, again, it’s about—it is about capacity and capital. Now, there 
are  always  issues  to  work  on,  in  terms  of  dispatching  and  actual 
operations.  We  don’t  want  to  minimize  that.  And  clearly,  we  need 
to be working those issues. But we, as an organization, need to get, 
and  we’re  in  the  process  of  getting,  closer  to  the  freight  railroads. 
That’s part of the answer. 

Senator CARPER. I remember visiting, once—I believe it was Bur-
lington  Northern  Santa  Fe’s  control  operations  down  there—I  be-
lieve,  in  Texas—and  had  these  huge  boards  that  electronically  dis-
play  all  kinds  of  things,  in  terms  of  what’s  going  on  throughout 
their  system  at  that  point  in  time.  Interesting,  one  part  of  one 
board—and the boards are probably as large as this—as tall as this 
room—it’s a huge—it looks like a stadium in which they do this op-
eration,  or  an  arena—but  one  of  the  things  that  they  were  fol-
lowing was how well the company is doing, in terms of helping Am-
trak to realize on-time performance, and, by doing that, to increase 
the bottom line at Burlington Northern Santa Fe. 

Some of the freights have historically had a pretty good working 
relationship  with  Amtrak,  some  have  not.  Union  Pacific  was  one 
that  always  has  a  history  of  not  having  a  good  relationship.  And 
let  me  just  say,  I  am  encouraged  by  what  you  just  reported,  and 
I hope that that will be more the norm, rather than the exception. 
Before  I  turn  to  our  other  panelists,  let  me  just  ask  you  to  com-
ment—you  and  I  have  talked  about  the—how  difficult  it  is  to  at-
tract good talent to do some high-skill work for—on trains, and the 
difficulty  that  you  face  when  you  try  to  hire—whether  it’s  elec-
tricians  or  other  skilled  tradesmen  and  -women.  Would  you  talk 
about that and share with us what—— 

Mr. KUMMANT. Sure. 
Senator CARPER.—what you think we ought to do, and what you 

need to do—— 

Mr. KUMMANT. Well, that’s right. I—— 
Senator CARPER.—the Board needs to do? 
Mr. KUMMANT. Look, there’s no question, we’ve had two-thirds of 
our  workforce  without  an  agreement  for  6  years.  That’s  not  good. 
I’ve  worked  very  hard  over  the  last  6  months,  in  terms  of  a  per-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

sonal  outreach  to  the  unions.  And  I  think,  you  know,  there’s  no 
doubt there’s a—there’s a fundamental piece, there are going to be 
issues  relative  to  workplace  flexibility  that  we  have  to  continue  to 
work through. I’m absolutely committed to getting a fair wage set-
tlement,  and  I  suspect,  in  the  end,  the  freight  railroads  will  most 
likely  have  a  settlement  that  probably  sets  a  pattern  for  us.  So,  I 
think  the  base  salary  issues  could  well  likely  be  set  in  a  pattern 
that  way,  and—which  will  leave  us  to  work  through,  you  know, 
some  sort  of  signing-bonus  issues  and  workplace  flexibility  issues. 
But  there’s  no  doubt  in  the  skilled  jobs,  like  electricians,  our  folks 
are  underpaid,  they  are  not  at  market.  It’s  critical  for  us  to  be  at 
market and really be able to manage to maintain equipment as so-
phisticated  as  the  Acela.  So,  that’s  very  important  to  us.  And  I’m 
committed to continue going down that path. 

Senator CARPER. I think everybody sitting up here was very sup-
portive of trying to provide $1.4 billion in the continuing resolution 
for the balance of this year in order to give Amtrak the ability to— 
and the Board the ability—to try to negotiate a settlement with its 
union  workforce.  And  we  came  close.  We  got  to  $1.3  billion.  And 
everybody  here  pushed  very  hard  for  that.  And  we’ll  certainly  en-
deavor  to  do  as  well  or  better  next  year.  Probably  better.  I  hope. 
Let  me  turn  to  our  other  panelists,  if  I  could,  some  constructive 
criticism.  And,  Ms.  Taylor,  you  were  effusive  in  your  praise  of  the 
legislation  that  Senator  Lautenberg,  Lott,  and  the  rest  of  us  have 
cosponsored  and  introduced.  How  could  we  make  it  better?  I’d  like 
to say, ‘‘Everything I do, I can do better,’’ and that includes all the 
legislation  I’ve  ever  introduced  or  written,  and  probably  this  bill, 
too. What could we do better? 

Ms.  TAYLOR.  Well,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Senator,  I  think  if  you— 
the  part  that  we  really  appreciate  is  the  cost-allocation  method-
ology, looking at States proportionally paying a fair share, because 
that’s  what  we  are  doing  on  the  Amtrak  Cascades  Corridor.  So, 
anything  to  do,  strengthen  that  and  make  sure  that  that  stays  in-
tact,  it  is  important.  But  looking  at  the  years  of  credit,  perhaps 
some State cycles don’t really match those years, as well, so maybe 
it  could  be  expanded  a  little  bit  to  add  years  as  to  what  the  credit 
window  is.  And  making  sure  that  credit  is  as  flexible  as  possible. 
I  know  that  different  States  made  different  kinds  of  investments. 
So,  to  make  sure  that  that  isn’t  somehow  leaving  something  out 
that was important for that service to exist. 

Senator CARPER. All right, thank you. 
Is  it  ‘‘Secretary  Busalacchi?’’  How  do  you  pronounce  your  name? 
Mr. BUSALACCHI. ‘‘Busalacchi,’’ you did a good job. 
Senator CARPER. Oh, OK. All right, thank you. 
Mr. BUSALACCHI. Thank you. 
Senator CARPER. I’ve been listening to Senator Lautenberg. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr. BUSALACCHI. Over the years, it has been hammered into the 

ground pretty good, so you did good. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator CARPER. Constructive criticism. How could we make this 

a little bit—— 

Mr. BUSALACCHI. Well—— 
Senator CARPER.—proposal better? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

Mr.  BUSALACCHI.—you  know,  we’re  very  upbeat  about  the  bill, 
Senator.  We  think  the  bill  is  just  an  excellent  piece  of  legislation. 
Obviously,  we  would  like  to  see  the  piece  for  the  State-sponsored 
amount a little bit larger than the 1.4 billion, because there are so 
many  projects  that  the  States  have  in  this  country,  the  needs  in 
this  country  are  huge.  And  when  you  talk  about  passenger  rail, 
they’re  huge.  And  when  you  add  everything  else  that’s  going  on  in 
transportation,  the  dollars  are  daunting.  But  we  like  the—we  like 
the  bill  a  lot.  I  just  want  to  stress,  again,  that  we  need  a  Federal 
partner.  It’s  going  to  be  very,  very  difficult  for  any  of  the  States, 
whether  it’s  the  Governor  or  whether  it’s  Ms.  Taylor,  any  of  us,  to 
do anything here unless we have a real strong Federal partner. 

And  I  do  understand—you  know,  Alex  talked  a  little  bit  about 

Senator  CARPER.  Mr.  Secretary,  my  time  is  limited,  so  I’m  going 

the situation—— 

to ask you to—— 

Mr. BUSALACCHI. Oh, all right. I’m sorry. 
Senator  CARPER.  I’m  going  to—thank  you  for—thank  you  for 
that.  And  if  you—if  some  constructive  changes  you  can  think  of 
that should be made, we want to hear. OK? Please. And thank you 
very much for being here, and your comments. 

Mr. Kummant, constructive criticism on our bill, please? 
Mr.  KUMMANT.  Again,  I  think  the  most—I  guess  I’ll  just  go  to 
where I think the most important pieces are, and clearly the State/ 
Federal matching piece, to us, really opens this whole thing up, be-
cause there it’s both about, you know, capital and equipment. We’ll 
probably  have  to,  I  think,  continue  through  some  of  the—some  of 
the  oversight  issues.  Look,  there’s  no  doubt  organizations  need 
pressure to improve things. I think one of the—one of the thorniest 
issues is obviously the on-time performance issues, how that’s mon-
itored,  how  that’s  looked  at.  I  think  it’s  a  very  thoughtful  bill  on 
those fronts. But I think a number of people may still go back and 
think  about  that,  you  know,  how  you  drive  that.  And  it  may  be 
linked,  in  some  way,  as  well,  with  capital  input.  But,  again,  I  just 
want  to  say  that,  fundamentally,  the  capital  matching  piece  really 
opens this up, and a multiyear funding structure. In the end, stag-
gering  from  1  year  to  the  next  is  something  that  hurts  the  organi-
zation a great deal. And so, any continuity in any of the provisions 
is a big plus. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you, Senator Carper. 
Senator CARPER. Thank you very much. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Senator Klobuchar? 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you,  to  the  panel.  Thank  you,  Mr. 
Chairman.  And  I  am  new  on  this  Subcommittee.  And,  just  so  you 
know, I’m from Minnesota. And I have always been a big fan of rail 
transportation.  In  fact,  I  grew  up—for  the  first  8  years  of  my  life, 
our only vacation was taking the Milwaukee Road, Mr. Busalacchi, 
to  Milwaukee  from  Minneapolis,  to  visit  my  grandma.  And  then,  I 
continued  to  take  train,  including  the  line  from  Seattle  to  Port-
land—I’ve taken that line before, Ms. Taylor—and I have—I appre-
ciated  all  the—the  chart  that  Senator  Lautenberg  put  up  there 
about  the  saving  of  energy  and  the  issues  with  traffic  jams  that 
we’re  seeing  in  Minnesota.  We’re  starting  to  see  some  commuter 
rail  that  we’re  going  to  be  doing  in  our  State.  But  I’d  also  like  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

add,  I  love  going  on  rail,  because  then  my  husband  and  I  don’t 
have any arguments about directions. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. So, you might want to include that in your 

future presentations. 

But  I  had  some  questions.  Secretary  Busalacchi,  first  of  all,  you 
talked  about  that  line,  the  high-speed  line,  Chicago  to  Milwaukee, 
and  then  potentially  expanding  it  to  Madison.  And  I  know  that 
Minnesota  is  part  of  this  States  for  Passenger—the  Rail  Coalition 
that  you’ve  talked  about.  Has  there  been  talk  about  expanding  be-
yond that? 

Mr.  BUSALACCHI.  Oh,  absolutely.  Minnesota’s  a  big  part  of  our 
plans. You know, once we extend to Madison, the next step will be 
to Minneapolis. That’s—and we just think that this corridor has so 
much potential, Senator, you know, economically, providing a lot of 
transportation  for  the  people  in  both  of  the  States.  So,  most  defi-
nitely, Minnesota will be part of this. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Good. 
And  then,  Mr.  Kummant,  the  Empire  Builder,  of  course,  goes 
through  Minnesota,  Red  Wing,  and  Winona,  and  then  up  through 
Minneapolis/St.  Paul  and  then  beyond.  Could  you  talk  a  little  bit 
about  that  route  and  what’s  been  happening  with  that,  the  rider-
ship  on  that  route,  and  where  you  see  the  future  for  that  route? 
Mr. KUMMANT. Well, that continues to be one of our best routes, 
one of our best long-distance draws. And one of the things we often 
point out about long-distance, if you look at the Empire Builder to-
gether with the Coast Starlight, you’re talking about almost a mil-
lion riders a year. You’re in the 800,000 or 900,000 range. So, that 
will  continue  to  be,  really,  one  of  our  iconic  routes.  We’ll  continue 
to  work  on  the  quality  of  that  service.  So,  basically,  what  I  would 
say  is,  that  will  be  there  for  a  long  time  to  come,  and  we  just  en-
deavor to make it—to make it better every year. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. And what’s the ridership—and I remember, 
a  few  years  ago,  them  closing  down  one  of  the  routes  or  some-
thing—— 

Mr. KUMMANT. I think it’s about—it’s about half a million people 
a year ride it. I’m—glance back and get a nod here. Yes, it’s about 
half  a  million  people  a  year.  So,  a  lot  of  people  see  that  stretch  of 
the  world.  But  I  also  know  it  provides  some  very  real  transpor-
tation  to  some  of  the  smaller  communities,  particularly  in  some  of 
the winter months. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Right.  And  then,  you  talked  about  the  rid-
ership. And, since I’m new on this Committee, if you could give me 
some  historical  perspective  on  that.  You  said  it  went  up  slightly 
from last year. 

Mr. KUMMANT. Yes—— 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  What  has  been  the  status  of  Amtrak’s  rid-

ership? 

Mr. KUMMANT. Last year, we had something approaching 24 mil-
lion  riders,  and  it  has  been—over  a  multiyear  period,  it  certainly 
has  grown  over  the  years.  There  was  a  peak  right  after  9/11,  and 
a  slight  dip.  And,  as  we’ve  seen  the  performance  improve  over  the 
last  few  years,  we  have,  as  a  system,  continued  to  creep  up  a  cou-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

ple  percent  a  year.  I’ll  have  to  glance  over  my  shoulder  here,  as 
well. I’m—— 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. I know. He’s there. 
Mr. KUMMANT.—quite new, also. So, in a 5-year trend, I probably 
can’t  give  you  a  very  specific  number.  But  it’s  been—it  has  been 
growing,  as  a  total  system,  a  percent  or  2  a  year  since  the—there 
was a bit of a dropoff after the 9/11 surge. 

That being said, if you think about the Northeast Corridor alone, 
you’re  talking,  there,  about  11  million  in  ridership.  Acela,  itself,  is 
about  3  million.  And  there,  you  see  Acela  growing  very  dramati-
cally. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  I’m  glad  that  Ms.  Taylor  and  Mr. 

Busalacchi—did I do that right, Frank? 

Mr. BUSALACCHI. You got it. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.—are  on  the  panel,  I  know  the  Northeast 
Corridor is so well traveled, but, there has just been a new renais-
sance in our State, and I’m sure you’ve seen the same thing—with 
an interest in rail, where people that, before, thought that, ‘‘That’s 
nothing I’m interested in. I get in my car.’’ We have a line that the 
Congress has helped to finance, going from the Twin Cities to—to-
ward  St.  Cloud.  It  stops  in  a  town  called  Big  Lake.  And  then,  we 
also  have  light  rail  going,  for  the  first  time.  We  were  behind  the 
eight  ball  in  Minnesota  on  the  rail.  But  there’s  just  much,  much 
interest in it. And I think it’s important to keep this in mind. And 
I—when you said, ‘‘We’ll build it, and they’ll come,’’ I just wondered 
if—you  know,  if  you  could—we  have  this  bill,  which  is  very  good, 
but, as you go forward, if you could have more, what you would see 
as  a  vision  for  the  Midwest,  and  what  you  would  like  to  see  done 
there. 

Mr.  KUMMANT.  Sure.  Well,  in  general,  let  me  say,  outside  of  the 
eastern  seaboard,  I  would  love  to  see  a  major  corridor  that  really 
catches  fire  and  attracts  capital  from  all  areas.  I  mean,  I  do  think 
there  is  opportunity  to  look  for  private  capital,  as  well.  And  those 
would  take  some  very  specific  approaches  and  instruments.  But  if 
you  can  find  routes  where  fluidity  helps  passenger  rail  and  mul-
tiple freight railroads, I think you’ve got a formula for really being 
able to expand capacity with private capital, as well. 

Take,  for  example—now,  this  would  be  passenger,  but  I  think 
you  could  get  from  downtown  Detroit  to  downtown  Chicago.  Now, 
it  would  take  some  significant  capital  to  get  across  some  very  con-
gested  areas.  You  know,  we’re  talking  about  $500  to  a  billion  dol-
lars,  something  like  that.  But,  nevertheless,  you  could  have  80-  to 
100-mile-an-hour  service  between  those  city  centers.  You  know,  I 
love the service between St. Louis and Chicago, as well. And then, 
you can add things—I would love to add things across the Nation— 
and, again, it would have to be in conjunction with the freight rail-
roads—dedicated  WiFi,  for  example,  along  those  lanes.  You  start 
thinking  about  time  and  place  differently  if  you  can  work  continu-
ously  on  a  train,  for  example,  on  your  computer,  with  very  high- 
speed transmission. 

California  still,  I  think,  is  rich  in  opportunity.  If  you—if  you 
looked  at  a  real  passenger  lane  between  the  Bay  Area  and  L.A.,  I 
mean, it’s about population centers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

But  I  think  all  the  Chicago-centered  lanes  can  be  expanded,  im-
proved,  and  really  driven  in  ridership.  So,  Illinois’s  done  a  great 
job, and, again, with the surrounding partnerships. The Hiawathas 
are a great story, where everything that’s done there, I think, has, 
in  the  end,  exceeded  any  forecasts.  So,  it’s  about  capital  and  part-
nership with the freight railroads. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you very much. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks very much. 
We  see,  now,  in  New  Jersey,  that  private  capital  is  to  our—one 
of  our  major  resort  areas,  Atlantic  City,  is  coming  in  to  help  buy 
cars  and  things  of  that  nature,  that—there  is  a  demand  for  rail 
service that I think is unmatched since the earliest days of the rail-
road.  But  we  do  see  that  when  lines  are  offered,  that  the  response 
is  quite  extraordinary.  And  we  are  now  creating  something  called 
the  Transit  Village  Transportation  Center,  and  building  homes 
around there that people can get to the trains—because commuting 
between  New  York  and  New  Jersey  is  quite  extensive.  And  there’s 
a lot of interest in being near public transportation, and especially 
if the—if it’s a good rail system, where reliability, et cetera, is pro-
vided.  When  you  see  how  much  pollution  we  might  save,  and  how 
much oil we might not need, or can reduce from having to buy, the 
advantages are so many. 

And, Mr. Boardman, I thank you for your statement and your in-
terest.  I  think  it’s  important  that  we  have  the  full  energy  of  the 
Administration employed here. It can make a huge difference. And 
I’ve heard some good comments. I read your testimony, and a little 
more  concerned  about  the  Administration’s  view—and  what  we 
have  to  do  to  get  through  this.  We  can’t  have  a  third-class  leg  in 
our  transportation  needs.  If  we  spend  $15  billion  a  year  on  avia-
tion,  it  has  made  aviation,  until  most  recently,  an  ideal  way  to 
travel.  But  our  country  needs  efficient  transportation  in  order  for 
us to keep up with the growth of our population, with the competi-
tive world that we live in. And I’d love to have the kind of support 
that  we  hear  requested  from  our  friends  in  the  States.  Yes,  it’s 
tough.  It’s  tough  in  New  Jersey.  We  have  a  State  that’s  highly  in-
debted,  and  we  can’t  find  a  lot  of  money  to  put  into  systems.  But 
we  are  scratching  it  and  muscling  anything  that  we  can  do  to  get 
that support, because we know that’s the payoff. It may never pay 
off  in  precise  dollars,  but  the  ancillary  benefits  that  come  are  fan-
tastic. 

And  so,  I  thank  each  of  you  for  your  parts,  especially  here  this 
morning.  It  was  a  good  hearing,  and  I’m  pleased  to  see  that  there 
is  enthusiasm  out  there  for  it.  We’re  going  to  work  very  hard,  and 
I  want  to  be  in  the  cab  of  the  newer,  the  latest  trains,  wherever 
that  corridor  is.  When—talk  about  a  corridor  you  were  going 
through,  Mr.  Kummant—railroad  access  from  Los  Angeles  to  Las 
Vegas—I mean, it would be—it would be fantastically attractive to 
people  who  make  that  trip.  And  the  cities  around  the  Great 
Lakes—I  mean,  this—I  think  this  map  is  really  impressive.  It 
touches  almost  every  State  in  the  country.  And  places,  like  Mon-
tana, that are relatively remote, that rail service that goes through 
there,  even  though  it  comes  through,  I  think,  at  very  late  hours— 
or  very  early  hours  in  the  morning,  because  it’s  a  cross-country 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

journey, is a very—an essential factor. We have Essential Air Serv-
ice. We need Essential Rail Service. 

Thank you all for coming. 
This hearing is concluded. 
[Whereupon, at 11:30 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

HON. JOSEPH H. BOARDMAN 

Question 1. The President’s Fiscal Year 2008 budget includes $100 million toward 
establishing  new  passenger  rail  service.  Would  this  be  budgeted  out  of  general 
funds, or from some other source? 

Answer. The President proposes that this be funded from the General Fund of the 

Treasury. 

Question 2. What is the $100 million figure based on? Does the President believe 

that $100 million could be spent on passenger rail projects in FY 2008? 

Answer.  The  number  is  admittedly  a  rough  estimate  of  what  could  be  obligated 
in  the  first  year  of  this  capital  grant  program  and  reflects  the  fact  that  a  limited 
number  of  States  such  as  California,  Illinois,  North  Carolina,  Virginia,  Washington 
and  Wisconsin  have  advanced  plans,  including  environmental  analyses,  completed 
for projects and could compete for grants in the first year. 

Question  3.  Is  the  Bush  Administration  prepared  to  commit  to  a  multi-year  pro-
gram  that  will  increase  funding  for  passenger  rail?  Or  is  this  just  a  one-year  ap-
proach? 

Answer.  The  Administration  proposes  that  an  ongoing  grant  program  be  created 
as  part  of  the  reform  of  how  this  country  provides  intercity  passenger  rail  service. 
A  long-term  Federal/State  partnership  to  support  intercity  passenger  rail  was  one 
of  the  five  principles  for  reform  articulated  by  former  Secretary  Norman  Y.  Mineta 
in  2002  and  incorporated  into  the  Administration’s  legislative  proposal,  the  Pas-
senger  Rail  Investment  Reform  Act,  which  was  submitted  to  Congress  in  2003  and 
2005. 

Question  4.  Your  testimony  states  that:  ‘‘The  Administration  believes  that  Am-
trak’s  debt  is  a  private  corporate  matter  and  should  remain  so.’’  Do  you  believe,  as 
an Amtrak Board Member, that the corporation’s debts should be paid at all? If so, 
and  assuming  no  substantial  increase  in  state  payments  to  Amtrak,  why  does  the 
Administration’s  proposal  not  provide  sufficient  funding  for  Amtrak  to  operate  its 
system and pay its debts? 

Answer.  As  the  Secretary’s  representative  on  Amtrak’s  Board  of  Directors,  I  be-
lieve that Amtrak should meet its debt service obligations and do so within the fis-
cal  resources  available  to  the  corporation.  Such  obligations  should  take  precedence 
over other uses of these resources such as subsidizing food and beverage service. It 
is important to point out that all of the debt obligations of the corporation were un-
dertaken with the clear knowledge by the corporation and the lenders that this debt 
was not guaranteed by the Federal Government. 

Question  5.  Assuming  no  substantial  increase  in  state  payments  to  Amtrak,  does 
the  Administration  believe  that  its  operation  subsidy  proposal  of  $300  million  for 
FY  2008  is  sufficient  to  operate  the  railroad  without  having  to  undergo  major  cuts 
in stations served or declare bankruptcy? 

Answer.  The  Administration  believes  that  decisions  by  Amtrak’s  management  on 
what  routes  and  services  Amtrak  operates  should  be  made  based  upon  the  avail-
ability  of  financial  resources  to  support  these  routes  and  services.  Management 
must  focus  its  efforts  to  improve  efficiency  and  cut  costs  and  some  tough  decisions 
may  be  required  in  order  to  remain  solvent.  This  is  no  different  from  what  other 
private for-profit corporations must do. 

Question  6.  You  serve  as  the  Secretary’s  designee  on  the  Amtrak  Board.  Did  you 

vote to approve Amtrak’s legislative request for FY 2008? Why or why not? 

Answer. I abstained from the vote on the management-proposed legislative report 

and grant request because it was inconsistent with the President’s proposal. 

Question 7. Do you feel you are sufficiently aware of the Federal subsidy and rev-
enue  needs  of  the  corporation  in  order  for  it  to  continue  to  provide  current  levels 
of service? 

(41) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

Answer. Yes. 
Question 8. Your testimony states: ‘‘Amtrak is an outdated monopoly that is based 
on  a  flawed  business  model.  It  does  not  provide  an  acceptable  level  of  service,  nor 
has it been able to control its finances.’’ As an Amtrak board member, what actions 
have  you  taken  specifically  to  encourage  Amtrak’s  provision  of  an  ‘‘acceptable  level 
of service’’ and what actions have you taken specifically to strengthen Amtrak’s abil-
ity to ‘‘control its finances?’’ 

Answer.  As  Secretary’s  Peters’  representative  on  Amtrak’s  Board,  I  am  an  advo-
cate  for  efforts  to  improve  the  safety,  quality  and  cost  effectiveness  of  the  services 
Amtrak  provides,  to  improve  Amtrak’s  financial  management  practices,  and  to  per-
mit the Corporation to live within the financial resources it has available. However, 
any  discussion  of  the  specifics  of  the  pre-decisional  positions  taken  by  any  of  the 
Board members would have an adverse impact on the deliberative process. 

Question 9. Do you, and does the Administration, believe that, per passenger-mile 

traveled, passenger rail offers: 

a. The opportunity to reduce greenhouse gas emissions in the U.S.? 
b. The opportunity to reduce oil consumption in the U.S.? 

Answer.  Like  so  much  related  to  Amtrak,  there  is  not  one  answer  that  covers  all 
of the services that Amtrak provides. In relatively well patronized intercity corridors 
such  as  between  Washington  and  New  York  City,  the  answer  is  yes.  On  a  longer 
corridor  where  an  Amtrak  consist  of  two  locomotives  and  five  cars  with  a  seating 
capacity  of  several  hundred  carries  less  than  100  passengers  on  a  trip,  the  answer 
is no. 

Question 10. Do you, and does the Administration, believe that investment in pas-

senger rail infrastructure can provide benefits to commuter rail services? 

Answer.  In  appropriate  corridors,  investment  in  intercity  passenger  rail  service 
could  provide  benefits  to  commuter  services  and  vice  versa.  Each  of  the  services 
should pay according to the benefits it receives. 

Question  11.  Your  testimony  states:  ‘‘S.  294  is  a  complex  bill  that  reflects  much 
work  and  thoughtful  consideration  by  the  bill’s  authors.  However,  it  falls  short  of 
making  necessary  reforms  identified  by  the  Administration  and  other  independent 
experts.’’  Which  ‘‘other  independent  experts’’  reviewed  the  bill,  and  provided  input 
for the Administration’s assessment? 

Answer.  The  Government  Accountability  Office,  the  Department’s  Inspector  Gen-
eral,  and  others  have  regularly  outlined  the  shortcomings  with  how  this  country 
provides  intercity  passenger  rail  service.  S.  294  does  not  comprehensively  address 
the  issues  they  have  independently  raised.  I  am  not  aware  that  they  have  yet  spe-
cifically been asked to comment on S. 294. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

HON. FRANK J. BUSALACCHI 

Question 1. As a member of the National Surface Transportation Policy and Rev-
enue  Study  Commission  we  created  in  the  Highway  bill,  can  you  tell  us  whether 
the Commission is taking seriously the role of passenger rail in the Nation’s future? 
Answer.  Consistent  with  our  mandate  from  Congress,  the  Commission  is  taking 
a  comprehensive  view  of  all  transportation  modes,  including  passenger  rail.  The 
Commission  staff  has  compiled  some  issue  papers  related  to  passenger  rail.  How-
ever,  one  of  the  critical  challenges  we  have  with  this  mode  is  trying  to  understand 
how  passenger,  freight  and,  in  some  regions,  commuter  rail  can  run  on  freight  rail 
lines that are already squeezed to capacity. 

On-time  performance  is  key  to  passenger  rail  and  rail  line  capacity  is  key  to  on- 
time  performance.  Working  with  fellow  Commissioner  Matt  Rose,  President  and 
CEO  of  the  Burlington  Northern  and  Santa  Fe  Railroad,  as  well  as  other  Class  I 
railroads, I hope that the Commission will be able to acquire data to provide an ac-
curate  picture  of  capacity  needs  and  the  investment  levels  necessary  to  address 
those needs. 

Our commission meetings and field hearings have featured testimony on intercity 
passenger rail issues. At field hearings, in particular, witness after witness has ad-
vocated for more Federal support of passenger rail. The Commission needs the best 
analysis  and  documentation  possible  on  intercity  passenger  rail,  given  its  growing 
importance to our national transportation system. 

Question  2.  Can  you  tell  us  what  potential  revenue  streams  might  work  to  fund 

passenger rail development? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

Answer.  State  transportation  department  secretaries  and  members  of  the  States 
for Passenger Rail Coalition have been careful to seek funding sources and revenue 
streams  for  passenger  rail  that  will  not  adversely  affect  the  already  under-funded 
highway and transit programs. We need a dedicated intercity passenger rail funding 
mechanism that is independent of the Highway Trust Fund. 

We  are  seeking  a  Federal  capital  program  that  will  provide  funds  to  states  for 
investments  in  both  intercity  passenger  rail  infrastructure  and  equipment.  In  the 
Federal highway and transit programs, this partnership generally entails an 80 per-
cent  Federal/20  percent  state  or  local  sharing  of  costs.  We  believe  this  is  a  sound 
approach for the delivery of an integrated national transportation system. The bene-
fits of a passenger rail system will accrue to the Nation as a whole. States are will-
ing to pay their share. 

Because  of  the  magnitude  of  most  state  intercity  passenger  rail  corridor  projects, 
we are also committed to identifying a multi-year funding source. A multi-year fund-
ing  source  is  needed  to  assure  the  completion  of  projects,  which  may  take  several 
years for infrastructure construction and equipment procurement. 

We have examined a variety of possible revenue sources and it appears that Gen-
eral  Funds  are  most  feasible  in  the  short  run,  given  the  lack  of  maturity  of  pas-
senger rail development in the United States and the magnitude of needs estimated 
by  the  American  Association  of  State  Highway  and  Transportation  Officials 
(AASHTO)  and  others.  User  fees,  such  as  ticket  taxes  or  facility  charges,  could  not 
provide the revenue stream needed in the short-term. 

Another  potential  short-  to  medium-term  funding  source  to  get  a  start  on  capital 
needs is bonding, specifically tax credit bonds. The key is to provide a federally-sup-
ported  bonding  structure  that  offers  a  true  Federal-state  partnership.  Traditional 
tax-exempt  bonds  do  not  meet  this  test;  while  they  provide  a  reduced  interest  rate 
to  states,  the  interest  and  principle  must  still  be  paid  by  the  states.  Tax  credit 
bonds  would  be  structured  so  states  pay  back  the  principle  while  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment  allows  bondholders  to  claim  tax  credits,  thus  reducing  Federal  revenues. 
As  the  U.S.  passenger  rail  system  matures,  and  its  associated  ridership  grows 
over time with Federal and state capital investments, it is likely that user fees could 
play a larger role in the mix of funding needed for capital improvements. 

Question 3. Are there other items our legislation should address per concerns you 

have heard during your participation on the Commission? 

Answer. I have not heard any specific concerns raised regarding S. 294 in my ac-
tivities  with  the  Commission.  However,  consistent  with  my  testimony  before  your 
Subcommittee,  a  number  of  those  who  have  testified  before  the  Commission  have 
identified the need for a dedicated Federal intercity passenger rail funding program 
with sufficient funding available to address the needs identified by the states. 

As  indicated  earlier,  a  passenger  rail  solution  will  only  be  possible  with  the  con-
sensus  and  support  of  our  freight  rail  partners.  We  may  need  to  address  choke 
points  in  our  current  rail  infrastructure.  I  will  work  hard  to  assure  that  passenger 
rail is part of the modal mix proposed by the Commission. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

ALEX KUMMANT 

Question.  How  has  on-time  performance  influenced  ridership  and  revenue  of  the 

railroad across the various lines? 

Answer.  Through  market  research,  Amtrak  customers  consistently  identify  on- 
time  performance  (OTP)  as  one  of  the  top  2  or  3  most  important  service  attributes 
in  the  intercity  travel  market.  Among  Acela  customers,  OTP  is  the  most  important 
service  attribute  by  a  wide  margin,  due  to  the  fact  that  approximately  85  percent 
of Acela’s ridership is for business travel. 

In  all  three  of  Amtrak’s  business  lines  (Northeast  Corridor,  Long  Distance,  and 
State-supported/Other  Short  Distance  Corridors),  on-time  performance  delivery  has 
significant  impacts  on  demand—good  on-time  performance  leads  to  increased  rider-
ship  and  ticket  revenues,  and  poor  on-time  performance  leads  to  demand  losses.  In 
general, the opportunity for incremental ridership and ticket revenues from OTP im-
provements is greatest when on-time performance is mediocre, say between 45 per-
cent and 70 percent. Conversely, when on-time performance is already high—say be-
tween  80  percent  and  90  percent—then  the  opportunity  for  incremental  demand 
from on-time performance improvements is less robust. 

Recent  Acela  performance  provides  an  example  of  how  OTP  improvement  can 
drive  ridership  and  revenue  growth.  Acela  OTP  has  improved  dramatically  from  a 
mediocre  level  of  64  percent  in  FY05  to  the  currently  high  level  of  88  percent  in 
FY07, as a result of intense executive level focus on service delivery. Customer sat-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

isfaction with overall Acela service is up sharply (+14 percent), and customer satis-
faction  with  on-time  performance  is  up  even  more  dramatically  (+17  percent)  over 
that period. Triggered by the OTP improvements, and combined with travel time re-
ductions, service frequency increases, service quality improvements, and more effec-
tive marketing communications, Acela ridership and ticket revenues so far in FY07 
are the highest they have ever been, exceeding FY06 levels by 20 percent (260K rid-
ers) and 23 percent ($36.5 million), respectively. 

Because on-time performance in the Northeast Corridor, where Amtrak is the op-
erator,  is  currently  running  above  80  percent,  the  greatest  opportunities  for  incre-
mental ridership and ticket revenues due to on-time performance improvements now 
exist outside the NEC, where Host Railroads control the operation. Among Amtrak’s 
Long  Distance  routes,  with  current  on-time  performance  of  only  43  percent,  the  in-
cremental  ticket  revenues  associated  with  a  20-point  improvement  in  OTP  is  over 
$21 million year. Similarly, in Amtrak’s Short Distance Corridors outside the NEC, 
where OTP is currently 67 percent, a 20-point improvement in on-time performance 
would  translate  into  an  additional  1  million  riders  and  nearly  $28  million  in  addi-
tional revenue. 

In sum, the value of good on-time performance to the customer translates into sig-
nificant  favorable  impacts  at  the  fare  box.  It  is  the  single  most  important  improve-
ment  that  we  can  make  to  substantially  impact  the  financial  performance  of  Am-
trak’s  Long  Distance  trains  and  State-supported/Other  Short  Distance  Corridor 
service  outside  of  the  NEC.  With  consistent  OTP  delivery,  Amtrak  is  in  a  position 
to  effectively  market  passenger  rail  service  to  the  traveling  public  and  to  expand 
our customer base through repeat ridership and increased customer retention. With 
this  dynamic  in  mind,  Amtrak  is  bringing  a  stronger  product  management  focus  to 
its  many  services,  and  to  our  Host  Railroad  relationships,  seeking  to  leverage  serv-
ice quality and OTP improvements to drive bottom line performance. 

Amtrak Service Attributes: Importance Ratings 

Amtrak 

Customers 

Acela 

Customers 

Providing a safe travel environment 
Providing information/annoucements about problems/delays 
Leaving and arriving on time 
Providing good value for the money 
Providing consistent service from one trip to the next 
Being a relaxing way to travel 
Treating me like a valuable customer 
Having helpful and pleasant personnel 
Having a smooth, comfortable ride 
Having staff who convey trust and confidence 
Providing an enjoyable experience 
Being close to your home and/or destination 
Allowing you to get up and move around 
Having staff available to answer questions/handle complaints 
Meets my individual needs as a traveler 
Being willing to make extra effort to meet my needs 
Being a fast way to travel 
Having convenient parking at the train station 
Having visible security in the train station 
Being leisure travel-oriented 
Being family travel-oriented 
Providing a unique travel experience 
Being business traveler-oriented 

Scale: 100% very important—>0% not important at all. 

90% 
89% 
87% 
86% 
83% 
82% 
81% 
81% 
80% 
77% 
74% 
73% 
73% 
69% 
68% 
67% 
65% 
61% 
57% 
49% 
41% 
34% 
33% 

86% 
86% 
93% 
77% 
84% 
75% 
77% 
69% 
82% 
65% 
63% 
80% 
68% 
55% 
57% 
57% 
85% 
56% 
45% 
26% 
22% 
18% 
60% 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

FY03 
FY04 
FY05 
FY06 
FY07 (thru Feb) 

Acela 

Actual 
OTP 

Year-over-Year 

Ridership 
Change 

Overall Customer 

Satisfaction 

57% 
59% 
64% 
85% 
88% 

¥9% 
+1% 

¥17%* 

+9% 
+20% 

na 
na 
71% 
77% 
85% 

Customer 

Satisfaction with 

OTP 

na 
na 
70% 
79% 
87% 

* Impacted also by April 2005 Acela equipment issues. 

Acela Ridership & Ticket Revenues (October–March) 

FY07 (est.) 

FY06 

Budget 

FY07% change vs 

FY06 

Budget 

Ridership 
Ticket Revenues 

1,539,500 
$195,112,000 

1,283,500 
$158,588,000 

1,357,600 
$167,713,000 

+19.9 
+23.0 

+13.4 
+16.3 

Æ 

.

s
p
e
1
m
m
u
k

VerDate Nov 24 2008  06:24 Sep 28, 2010 Jkt 036075 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\36075.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
m
a

t

